energies
Article
HEMS-IoT: A Big Data and Machine Learning-Based
Smart Home System for Energy Saving
Isaac Machorro-Cano 1 , Giner Alor-Hernández 1,* , Mario Andrés Paredes-Valverde 1 ,
Lisbeth Rodríguez-Mazahua 1, José Luis Sánchez-Cervantes 2 and José Oscar Olmedo-Aguirre 3
1 Tecnológico Nacional de México (I. T. Orizaba), Av. Oriente 9, 852. Col. Emiliano Zapata, Orizaba 94320,
Veracruz, Mexico; imachorro@gmail.com (I.M.-C.); mparedesv@ito-depi.edu.mx (M.A.P.-V.);
lrodriguezm@ito-depi.edu.mx (L.R.-M.)
2 CONACYT-Tecnológico Nacional de México (I. T. Orizaba), Av. Oriente 9,852. Col. Emiliano Zapata,
Orizaba 94320, Veracruz, Mexico; jlsanchez@conacyt.mx
3 Department of Electrical Engineering, CINVESTAV-IPN, Av. Instituto Politécnico Nacional 2,508,
Col. San Pedro Zacatenco, Delegación Gustavo A. Madero, Mexico City 07360, Mexico;
oolmedo@cinvestav.mx
* Correspondence: galor@ito-depi.edu.mx; Tel.: +52-272-725-7056; Fax: +52-272-725-7056

Received: 1 February 2020; Accepted: 27 February 2020; Published: 2 March 2020 
Abstract: Energy efficiency has aroused great interest in research worldwide, because energy
consumption has increased in recent years, especially in the residential sector. The advances in energy
conversion, along with new forms of communication, and information technologies have paved the
way for what is now known as smart homes. The Internet of Things (IoT) is the convergence of various
heterogeneous technologies from different application domains that are used to interconnect things
through the Internet, thus allowing for the detection, monitoring, and remote control of multiple
devices. Home automation systems (HAS) combined with IoT, big data technologies, and machine
learning are alternatives that promise to contribute to greater energy efficiency. This work presents
HEMS-IoT, a big data and machine learning-based smart home energy management system for
home comfort, safety, and energy saving. We used the J48 machine learning algorithm and Weka
API to learn user behaviors and energy consumption patterns and classify houses with respect to
energy consumption. Likewise, we relied on RuleML and Apache Mahout to generate energy-saving
recommendations based on user preferences to preserve smart home comfort and safety. To validate
our system, we present a case study where we monitor a smart home to ensure comfort and safety
and reduce energy consumption.
Keywords: domotic; energy saving; IoT; machine learning; monitoring
1. Introduction
Nowadays, increasing energy efficiency is used to face the great world challenges, such as
energy security, air pollution, climate change and economic crises, among others. Energy efficiency
alternatives have the power to optimize energy consumption and reduce greenhouse gas emissions,
thus contributing positively to the preservation of natural ecosystems and human health. Additionally,
energy efficiency alternatives help mitigate the economic effects in the workplace [1]. Energy efficiency
has aroused great interest in research worldwide, because energy consumption has increased in recent
years, especially in the residential sector. For this reason, organizations and governments worldwide are
proposing actions for energy conservation with the purpose of reducing energy-related inconveniences.
The residential sector is attributed a high energy consumption; however, home automation systems
(HAS), combined with IoT, are alternatives that promise to contribute to greater energy efficiency [2].
Energies 2020, 13, 1097; doi:10.3390/en13051097 www.mdpi.com/journal/energies
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 2 of 24
Likewise, advances in energy conversion, communication, and information technologies have
paved the way for a new generation of homes—smart homes—thus allowing people to improve aspects
of their houses, such as comfort, convenience, safety, and entertainment, while simultaneously helping
them to cut energy waste. Additionally, Home Energy Management Systems (HEMS) are important in
achieving the goals of smart energy homes in many countries. Likewise, the smart home market is
growing rapidly. In particular, it is improving in areas such as fire detection, lighting, entertainment,
and energy efficiency systems, among others [3]. In addition, in recent years, energy conservation
action plans for the residential sector have gained prominence, since they contemplate indoor comfort
and energy efficiency. In this sense, it is worth mentioning that user behavior patterns in terms of
energy consumption change according to user needs and lifestyles, yet there is always an inclination to
maintain indoor comfort at the expense of power saving. Therefore, to design and implement effective
energy saving action plans, it is important to know not only the link between indoor comfort and
energy consumption, but also home characteristics and home resident needs [4].
On the other hand, in recent years, the Internet has impacted people’s daily lives through a new
paradigm called IoT, which is present in smart homes, retail, education, government services, smart
grids, agriculture, communication and business, among others. The IoT is the combination of various
technologies belonging to application domains that interconnect objects or things through the Internet;
by doing so, IoT-based things or objects acquire detection, monitoring, and remote-control capabilities.
Some of the most common IoT technologies include cloud computing, Wireless Sensor Networks
(WSN), Radio Frequency Identification (RFID), networks and communication, machine-to-machine
(M2M) interaction, Real-Time Systems (RTS) and mobility support, among others [5,6]. The IoT can
collect, distribute, and analyze data to convert it into knowledge and information [7]. Therefore, it
is important to further research and develop energy optimization mechanisms across different IoT
application domains. Moreover, appropriate energy saving and collection proposals and programming
algorithms should continue to be sought, since renewable energy sources are becoming more important
every day. Additionally, researchers estimate that the adoption of the IoT is based on the success of
these energy optimization proposals [8].
IoT devices for smart homes have restricted capabilities; hence, it is important to incorporate more
data handling options to successfully collect, manage, and analyze large volumes of data. Some of
these alternatives include machine learning and big data technologies. To collect and analyze large
volumes of information, big data analytics technologies are used [9]. Moreover, they allow large
volumes of sensor data to be effectively analyzed and used [10]. On the other hand, machine learning
is part of artificial intelligence, because it is responsible for studying algorithms and statistical models
based on patterns and inferences that systems use to meet their goals [11]. Likewise, machine learning
is broadly used in real-time applications due to its viability and robustness. In addition, machine
learning provides solution alternatives to learning-based problems and identifies the background and
characteristics of such problems to learn from them and thus increase system functioning. Finally,
machine learning executes actions requiring previously obtained knowledge, which is classified as
reinforcement learning, unsupervised, and supervised [12].
Current challenges in smart homes are areas of opportunity for the IoT paradigm, machine
learning, and big data technologies. In this work, we propose HEMS-IoT, a big data and machine
learning-based smart home energy management system for home comfort, safety, and energy saving.
Machine learning techniques and big data technologies are important in this work because they help
our system analyze and classify energy consumption efficiency, identify user behavior patterns, and
offer them increased comfort at home. HEMS-IoT relies on the machine learning algorithm J48 and
Weka API to know energy consumption patterns and user behavior patterns. Likewise, we relied on
RuleML and Apache Mahout to generate energy-saving recommendations based on user preferences
to preserve smart home comfort and safety. Finally, to validate HEMS-IoT, we introduce a case study
in which we monitor a smart home to ensure comfort and safety and reduce energy consumption.
HEMS-IoT is an extension of the works presented in [13] and [14].
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 3 of 24
The remainder of this paper is structured as follows. Section 2 discusses works on IoT, big data
technologies, energy efficiency strategies for smart homes, intelligent agents, and machine learning.
Next, in Section 3, we introduce the architecture of HEMS-IoT and discuss a case study in which we
monitor a smart home to ensure comfort and safety and reduce energy consumption. In Section 4,
we present the results from the case study discussed in the before section. Finally, in Section 5,
we present the conclusions and the future work.
2. Related Work
The IoT is modifying citizens’ living environments by moving from a traditional home to a smart
home [15]. In smart homes, people can control, monitor, and manage energy consumption according
to their lifestyle [3]. In this section, we present a review of related works with IoT initiatives for energy
efficiency in smart home. We pay close attention to those initiatives using machine learning and big
data. For instance, in their work, Kang et al. [16] proposed an IoT-based system that uses a three-level
context creation model for environment-sensitive services in the domotic space. IMS was designed
with open source software and hardware in order to extend in the IoT context. The system was tested
as IMS-based smart home services in two scenarios: a smart home health care service and a disaster
management service. Also, Adiono et al. [17] introduced an optimization protocol for WSN through an
architecture for a smart home. This architecture is divided into two environments, exterior and interior,
which communicate through an access point. The user´s home can be controlled from anywhere and
anytime by a smart phone. SQLite database system was used for the implementation and different tests
for the validation. Lee et al. [18] proposed a web services architecture for home service environments.
Three layers shape the architecture: (1) information layer, (2) management layer, and (3) presentation
layer. The service overlay network was used in this work to generate new service composition in
the IoT context. By contrast, Montesdeoca-Contreras et al. [19] implemented an IoT application for
controlling and monitoring smart homes. Namely, the application allows users to monitor and control
domotic devices through tactile functions or voice commands, including a safety net. The application
was developed with App Inventor and Android Studio.
Chilipirea et al. [20] proposed a method for creating models for IoT applications that facilitates the
generation of robust, energy-efficient systems in a home security system. The model used the overlap
between device characteristics to preserve energy and temporarily disable part of them. Elkhorchani
and Grayaa [21] proposed a shedding algorithm for home energy usage and an architecture of a smart
home energy management system. This work was based on domestic renewable energy sources,
wireless communication among domotic devices, a control system and a home management system,
and on grid management. Likewise, Salman et al. [22] proposed a smart system for energy efficient
IoT-based homes with a cooling system was demonstrated the heat distribution in the kitchen area and
virtual model of flow. The system remotely controls heating/cooling and lighting when an occupant
leaves or enters the kitchen. In their work, Al-Ali et al. [9] introduced an Energy Management System
(EMS) for smart homes. The EMS relies on MQTT (Message Queue Telemetry Transport), is empowered
with Business Intelligence (BI) and analytics and uses big data. The system was validated using HVAC
(Heating, Ventilation and Air Conditioning) to simulate the small residential area systems.
Baker et al. [23] introduced and tested the algorithm E2C2, an energy-aware multi-cloud IoT service
composition which can generate energy efficient composition proposals by adding services from service
providers that are scattered globally. By contrast, Matsui [24] proposed an data provision system for
both maintaining indoor comfort and decreasing electricity consumption with data provision to modify
home resident behaviors. Fensel et al. [25] presented the OpenFridge platform and approach for energy
saving in electrical appliances, particularly refrigerators. The approach demonstrated the feasibility
of users eventually using it up for data economy and interacting with semantic energy information.
Additionally, Hossain et al. [26] proposed an energy-efficient cyber–physical smart home system. Using
cloud big data and computing, the system monitors the elderly to assist them in maintaining energy
efficiency at home. In addition, in this work was proposed a smart multimedia-enabled middleware
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 4 of 24
assistant to receive notifications relating to the status of domotic devices, visualize energy-efficient
processes, share multimedia messages and control smart domotic devices through gestures.
Golam et al. [27] proposed an architecture that uses web objects for offering energy efficient
comfortable living services for smart home IoT services. In addition, a conceptual semantic ontology
model was designed using the tool Protégé for use in the smart home scenario. Additionally, Chauhan
and Babar [28] presented a Web-of-Things (WoT) system to manage appliances. The system tries to
meet some of the standard business needs and the quality of smart homes. The use of a Reference
Architecture (RA)-centered approach for the evolution of the WoT and IoT systems was proposed in this
work. In addition, Lanfur and Pérez [29] implemented a real-time video streaming and transmission
security system in a residential scale model. The system allows lights to be turned off and on, and
doors to be closed and opened as occupants enter/leave a room. Also, the system relies on motion
sensors to obtain information that can be visualized through a web interface. Iqbal et al. [30] presented
architecture that uses the ZigBee technologies to minimize unnecessary electrical energy usage in
smart homes, based in the context of IoT. The architecture is powered by GRAPHX, Bit Data, SPARK,
and Hadoop for data analysis.
Marinakis et al. [31] proposed an architecture of a big data platform that can create, develop,
maintain, and exploit smart energy services using cross-domain data. A web-based Decision Support
System (DSS) according to the proposed architecture was developed to use multi-sourced information
to generate management activity strategies in the domotic space. Jo and Ik-Yoon [32] presented three
intelligent models as IoT platform application services for a smart home: (1) intelligence energy
efficiency as a service (IE2S) to perform the role of a server and process the information collected by IAT
using the Mobius platform and an artificial TensorFlow engine for data learning, (2) intelligence service
TAS (IST) to manage, and provide control the service stage, and (3) intelligence awareness target as
a service (IAT) to manage the “things” stage. Filho et al. [33] proposed STORm, a decision-making
solution for residential environments that combines computational intelligence and fog computing.
STORm retrieves, processes, disseminates, detects, and controls the information sent by sensors installed
in a residential scenario to apply the decision-making process. Additionally, Tao et al. [34] developed a
multilayered architecture based on the cloud and a home automation anthology supported by the IoT.
The anthology was used to address application heterogeneity, data representation, and knowledge.
Iqbal et al. [35] developed an interoperable IoT-based platform for domestic environments using
web-based objects and the cloud. The platform facilitates the control of domotic devices from different
locations, provides important household information to analyze applications and various services,
and tries to improve resource utilization. Yassine et al. [36] proposed a platform for smart homes that
combines big data analytics technology and IoT with cloud computing and fog. This platform is a fast
and efficient solution that supports large volumes of smart home information. In addition, Matsui [37]
presented a HEMS to obtain information from a smart home, with the purpose of maintaining interior
comfort and reducing energy consumption according to resident comfort preferences, which were
previously provided and set through a web page. On the other hand, Terroso-Saenz et al. [38] presented
IoTEO, an IoT energy platform that attempts to be the first holistic solution for the management of IoT
energy information. IoTEO relies on FIWARE to deal with energy quality and support data analytics.
Likewise, Park et al. [39] proposed a thermal comfort-based controller (TCC-V1) to decrease the energy
consumed by cooling residential buildings. To energy optimal control, the controller uses the predicted
mean vote (PMV).
Bouaziz et al. [40] proposed EMA-RPL, a new energy efficient and mobility aware routing protocol
which is based on Lossy Networks (the RPL standard) and the Routing Protocol for Low power.
EMA-RPL enables the better sustaining of connectivity of conserving energy and mobile nodes. By
contrast, Mancini et al. [41] presented the characterization of three control systems based on user energy
consumptions habits. The authors used a demand/response (DR) program and procedure to evaluate
energy consumption and economic savings. Similarly, they conducted a financial analysis of the
investment needed to implement the program. Sun et al. [42] proposed an energy-efficient mechanism
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 5 of 24
that optimizes IoT service compositions to support concurrent requests. The mechanism reduces energy
consumption in the network and improves the exchange of IoT services among concurrent requests. In
addition, Meena et al. [43] presented a framework for optimal planning of hybrid energy conversion
systems (battery energy storage system, photovoltaic cells, and wind turbine) in smart homes. The
model aims at generating less costly and more reliable alternatives for smart homes for middle-class
families. Alarif and Tolba [12] proposed AQL (Adaptive Q-Learning), a reinforcement-based learning
technique to increase network performance with reduced energy–overhead tradeoff in a smart device
(sensor) cloud-assisted internet of things (CIoT).
Matsui et al. [4] presented a study on energy usage patterns to then propose an energy conservation
action plan. To this end, the researchers gathered real-time data on energy consumption and indoor
temperature in a Tokyo residential area using IoT devices and sensors. Then, the data were analyzed
using three types of method: a clustering algorithm, a correlation analysis, and a classification of
indoor temperature for detached houses with different building structure and ages, and condominium
apartments. From a similar perspective, Le and Benjapolakul [44] conducted a study to test the energy
yield of the rooftop photovoltaics (PV) systems based on machine learning techniques (i.e., multiple
linear regression and bootstrap). The authors identified an association between technical configuration
details of PV (number of inverters, number of panels, rated solar panel power, and rated inverter
power) and the energy yield. In addition, Castro-Antonio et al. [45] presented a Robotics Operation
System (ROS) that integrates various types of services in a single smart home service system. The
ROS provides services to smart homes without fully recognizing them through a collection of sensors,
cameras, and by incorporating autonomous service robots that can move inside the home and interact
with the residents.
Huh et al. [46] introduced the design of a Smart Metering Control System and a series of tests
based on power line communication (PLC) using smart agents (i.e., program in charge of collecting data
or performing certain actions without user intervention). For the tests, the authors used a smartphone
and an Android mobile application. On the other hand, the protocols in the system were developed
with languages C++ and C. In addition, the system was developed and integrated in Java with the
purpose of being a basic element for the Smart Grid. Likewise, Jung and Huh [47] proposed a model
to predict atypical data of a linear transmission point using the A-Deep Q-Learning algorithm in
combination with the altered K-means algorithm. The goals were to identify atypical information of
the same linear transmission point in big data, and to know the objective of its elements. Additionally,
the model makes it easy to automatically select values from cluster k, which is based on unlabeled
sensors and big data. In addition, Yassine et al. [48] proposed a model to identify patterns of human
activity to support the health care of people from their homes. The model makes use of big data to
analyze the activities of the inhabitants at home. Additionally, pattern mining is proposed to analyze
energy consumption variation in domotic devices, which depends on the behavior of the inhabitants.
Also, in the model, FP-growth was used to identify patterns, whereas the k-means algorithm was used
to know the relationship among devices influencing energy consumption.
Zhao et al. [49] proposed a neutral blockchain-based data trading protocol within the big
data market to increase the availability, fairness, and privacy of data trading. The blockchain
infrastructure has the main advantage of debugging failures in any of the big data market points.
Additionally, similarity learning was used to increase the quality and availability of information
from data providers, and an extension of the double authentication preventing signature (DAPS)
was carried out. Additionally, Risteska Stojkoska and Trivodaliev [50] proposed a framework that
integrates different components from IoT architectures/frameworks proposed in other works in order
to efficiently integrate smart home objects in a cloud-centric IoT solution. Likewise, the authors
identified a smart home management model for their architecture, along with the tasks to be performed
at each architectural level. Finally, the authors discussed current challenges in smart home design,
emphasizing such aspects as interoperability, information processing, and communication protocols.
Rathore et al. [51] proposed an IoT-based system that relies on different types of sensors installed in a
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 6 of 24
home to contribute to smart city development and urban planning through big data. The system uses
a four-tier architecture: (1) bottom tier-1, (2) intermediate tier-1, (3) intermediate tier-2, and (4) top tier.
In addition, the system is implemented using Hadoop with Spark, voltDB, Storm or S4 for real-time
information processing and data collection.
As the previous paragraphs show, a great range of applications and IoT tools seek to contribute
to energy-saving efforts in smart houses. Likewise, note that many of the analyzed works
established models, communication protocols, technologies, and security paradigms to guarantee
the interoperability and integrity of domotic systems. However, it seems that only a few initiatives
can automatically, and without much user intervention, handle and operate decisions of smart home
devices connected to a domotic control system. From this perspective, HEMS-IoT is a solution that
integrates and provides access to information from different IoT providers, domotic devices, and
sensors. Likewise, our system analyzes the information collected from big data technologies and
machine learning algorithms and offers knowledge on efficient energy consumption and home comfort
through recommendations, rules, and alerts. Overall, HEMS-IoT monitors domotic devices and sensors
in real time, provides energy-saving recommendations, and facilitates communication and interaction
between devices and with users. The following section describes the architecture and functionality of
HEMS-IoT and discusses our case study.
3. Materials and Methods
Home automation is part of the application domain IoT personal and social and thus offers
many opportunities for developing new useful applications [52]. Home automation refers to a set of
techniques aimed at automating a home, which integrate technology into security, energy management,
and welfare. Comfort is essential in a home automation system and comprises all the actions performed
to improve the way home residents feel in their houses [37]. However, home automation applied in
the IoT faces a major challenge—few communication systems ensure device interconnectivity [50].
This problem arises from the lack of unified protocols and the many different lifestyles of users
coexisting in smart cities [53]. In the following subsections, we present and describe the architecture
and functionality of HEMS-IoT and discuss a case study where our system is implemented.
3.1. Architecture Description
HEMS-IoT is a home energy management system that seeks to contribute to the comfort and
security of smart homes, while simultaneously helping residents save energy. To this end, HEMS-IoT
uses IoT devices, big data technologies, and machine learning to manage energy consumption.
Also, HEMS-IoT allows for the real-time monitoring of domotic devices and home sensors. All the
information obtained is analyzed and processed using machine learning algorithms to learn energy
consumption patterns and user behavior patterns and make relevant recommendations for cutting
energy waste.
3.2. HEMS-IoT: Architecture and Functionality
HEMS-IoT has a seven-layered architecture, which facilitates the system’s maintenance and
allows for high scalability. The architecture of HEMS-IoT is presented in Figure 1, and integrates the
presentation layer, the IoT services layer, the security layer, the management layer, the communication
layer, the data layer, and the device layer. Every layer has a clearly defined function and includes
multiple components having a specific functionality within their corresponding layer.
• Presentation layer. This layer ensures bonding between the user and the system through either a
mobile application or a web application. At the presentation layer, users can visualize energy
consumption data, available IoT services, power consumption history, and recommendations. As
a web application, HEMS-IoT receives information and allows users to manipulate and control
domotic devices through various devices. As a mobile application, HEMS-IoT works on the
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 7 of 24
Android operating system for users to manage and control domotic devices. In addition, with the
mobile application, users monitor home domotic devices, incorporate new rooms, remove or add
domotic devices from a particular room in the house, and obtain energy-saving recommendations.
The application also displays charts to consult energy consumption patterns on a daily, weekly,
and monthly basis and offers users energy-saving recommendations for their smart homes.
• Security layer. This layer guarantees information security and hence guarantees the confidentiality
and secure collection of data from the device layer. Communication between the device layer and
the security layer is not direct, since they communicate through the communication layer and the
management layer.
• IoT services layer. This layer serves as a link between the application layer and the management
layer. Additionally, this layer provides various REST services, allowing users to fully exploit the
functionalities of HEMS-IoT.
• Management layer. This layer performs and manages the actions to meet user requirements
requested at the application layer. To this end, the IoT layer uses the REST API to ensure
communication between the presentation layer and the management layer.
• Data layer. This layer saves the data generated in the device layer. Namely, the data layer relies
on modules to manage five types of information: recommendations, service profiles, sensed data,
device profiles, and user profiles. The recommendations module is responsible for managing
comfort and energy-saving recommendations. In turn, the service profile manages data on the
provision of system services. The sensed data module saves and manages all the information
collected by the device layer from the smart home, such as gas/water/energy consumption and
room temperature, among others. The device profile module handles data on domotic devices,
such as their status and location, among others. Finally, the user profile module manages user
information, such as full address, name, and gender, among others.
• Communication layer. This layer considers elements such as a set of sensors, HTTP and TCP/IP,
and 4G communication to establish the communication protocols for each domotic device. Other
layers in the architecture communicate with each other through the communication layer.
•EnergiDese 2v0i2c0e, 1l3a,y 1e0r9.7 This layer facilitates data linkage and reception from various domotic devices.7A olfs 2o4, 
the device layer controls actuators and home automation devices.
• and obtain energy-saving recommendations. The application also displays charts to consult The following subsections describe the most important aspects of HEMS-IoT.
energy consumption patterns on a daily, weekly, and monthly basis and offers users energy-
saving recommendations for their smart homes. 
 
Figure 1.. Architecture of HEMS-IoT.. 
• Security layer. This layer guarantees information security and hence guarantees the 
confidentiality and secure collection of data from the device layer. Communication between the 
device layer and the security layer is not direct, since they communicate through the 
communication layer and the management layer. 
• IoT services layer. This layer serves as a link between the application layer and the management 
layer. Additionally, this layer provides various REST services, allowing users to fully exploit the 
functionalities of HEMS-IoT. 
• Management layer. This layer performs and manages the actions to meet user requirements 
requested at the application layer. To this end, the IoT layer uses the REST API to ensure 
communication between the presentation layer and the management layer. 
• Data layer. This layer saves the data generated in the device layer. Namely, the data layer relies 
on modules to manage five types of information: recommendations, service profiles, sensed 
data, device profiles, and user profiles. The recommendations module is responsible for 
managing comfort and energy-saving recommendations. In turn, the service profile manages 
data on the provision of system services. The sensed data module saves and manages all the 
information collected by the device layer from the smart home, such as gas/water/energy 
consumption and room temperature, among others. The device profile module handles data on 
domotic devices, such as their status and location, among others. Finally, the user profile module 
manages user information, such as full address, name, and gender, among others. 
• Communication layer. This layer considers elements such as a set of sensors, HTTP and TCP/IP, 
and 4G communication to establish the communication protocols for each domotic device. Other 
layers in the architecture communicate with each other through the communication layer.  
• Device layer. This layer facilitates data linkage and reception from various domotic devices. 
Also, the device layer controls actuators and home automation devices. 
The following subsections describe the most important aspects of HEMS-IoT. 
3.2.1. Device Layer 
An efficient home energy-saving system must take into account resident preferences in order to 
successfully control how domotic devices operate in the house. However, home energy consumption 
also depends on other factors, such as external environment, natural ventilation, temperature 
 
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 8 of 24
3.2.1. Device Layer
An efficient home energy-saving system must take into account resident preferences in order to
successfully control how domotic devices operate in the house. However, home energy consumption
also depends on other factors, such as external environment, natural ventilation, temperature variations
through seasons, and the age of residents, to name but a few. Some examples of the devices considered
in the device layer of HEMS-IoT are listed as follows:
• Gateways. These objects allow smart home automation devices to remain interconnected. Likewise,
gateways are the link between external networks and domotic devices installed in the smart home
and make it easier to control domotic devices both remotely and locally. The gateways used in
smart homes are border devices that allow access between external and local networks within
a house. Because the different home automation devices linked to the smart home connect to
other networks or even the Internet, gateways handle the main communication access between
those networks.
• Sensors. They collect data on different parameters of the smart home, such as risk of burglary, gas
or water leaks, and room temperature, among others.
• Actuators. They are usually of various types and are installed throughout the house. Actuators are
used to change the status of domotic devices and some home facilities. For instance, actuators can
interrupt the water and gas supply, issue failure or risk warnings, increase or decrease temperature
from air conditioners, or adjust light intensity from smart bulbs.
• Controllers. These devices allow users to control domotic devices with respect to the chosen
parameters. HEMS-IoT retrieves data from the various sensors installed in a house and processes
the data by means of an algorithm. Then, the system prepares the rules necessary to invoke
the actuators. Likewise, HEMS-IoT allows users to monitor the status of the operating domotic
devices, thus making home residents completely involved in the process. Users can also control
and program the actuators and sensors installed in the smart house through a centralized control
system and using a touch screen, a keyboard, or a voice interface, among others.
3.2.2. Communication Layer
Home needs vary across smart homes, yet the most common include indoor cooling or heating,
hot water, and lighting. HEMS-IoT needs to draw upon on reliable communication networks to
successfully retrieve energy consumption data and user behavior data. Some of the protocols used in
the communication layer of HEMS-IoT are listed below:
• ZigBee. The ZigBee Alliance developed the ZigBee protocol following the IEEE802.15.4,
a low-power wireless network standard. ZigBee is a low-cost and high-level protocol used
to establish personal networks through reduced, low-power digital radios that send information
wirelessly to larger areas. In addition, ZigBee is used in low information rate applications that
require secure networking and long battery life. Finally, ZigBee considers various kinds of network
topologies, including the tree, star, and mesh topologies.
• TCP/IP. The US Department of Defense developed the Transfer Control Protocol/Internet Protocol
(TCP/IP) with the purpose of intercommunicating computers with various operating systems
(minicomputers, PCs, and central computers), which work in local area networks (LAN) or
wide area networks (WAN). The TCP/IP protocol is a group of protocols that determine various
premises and rules for machines from different providers to exchange data through public
telephone networks, such as WAN and LAN networks. The Internet design is based on the
TCP/IP protocol.
• HTTP/IP. The World Wide Web Consortium (W3C) and the Internet Engineering Task Force (IETF)
developed the Hypertext Transfer Protocol (HTTP), which is used in any type of transaction
made over the Internet. HTTP helps to define the semantics and syntax used by various agents
(servers, clients and proxy) to communicate among them. HTTP is a request-response-client-server
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 9 of 24
protocol, where the HTTP user sends a request to an HTTP server; then, the server returns the
message with a response. User requirements include programs, translations, files, and database
queries, among others. All the data executed on the Web through HTTP are identified with either
an HTTP address or a uniform resource locator (URL).
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 9 of 24 
The communication layer helps home residents control smart home devices, both intelligently and
eroffiocmie nttelmy. pTehreatguorael, inmtohtisonla, yaenr dis thoec oalilre cctoinfdoirtmioanteiro’ns ftreomptehreatduirffee, reton tnIoaTm-be abseudt dae vfeiwce.s Finigstuarlele d2 
inlluasstrmataerst thhoem ge.nTerhael swe odraktfalopwro ovfi dHeEiMnfSo-rImoTa tiino nthoen cothmemhuomnieca, tsiuocnh layseern. ergy consumption, room
temp erature, motion, and the air conditioner’s temperature, to name but a few. Figure 2 illustrates the
gener al workflow of HEMS-IoT in the communication layer.
 
 
Figure 2.. Workflflow of HEMS-IoT.. 
AAss sseeeenn iinn FFiigguurree 22,, sseennssoorrss aarree aa kkeeyy eelleemmeenntt iinn ssmmaarrtt hhoommee mmoonniittoorriinngg.. BByy ccoolllleeccttiinngg rreeaall--ttiimmee 
iinnffoorrmmaattiioonn,, sesnensosrosrsa llaolwlowH EHMESM-IoST-ItooTa ntoal yazneaalynzdei daenndti fyidheonwtifmy uhcohwp omwuerchsm paortwheorm semaaprpt lihanocmees 
aanpdpldiaenvciceess aanrde cdoenvsiucems ianrge. cUosnesrusmcainngv.i sUusaelrizse caannd vmisuoanliitzoer athnids  imnfoonrmitoart itohniso innfaodrmailaytiboans iosnt oa mdaaiklye 
tbhaesinse tcoe mssaakrye ethnee rngeyc-essasvairnyg eanderjugsyt-msaevnitnsg.  Aadlsjuos,ttmhaennktss. tAolsseon, tshoarns,kHs EtoM seSn-IsooTrsc, aHnEisMsuSe-IoapTp craonp irsisautee 
eanpeprrgoyp-rsiaavtien genreercgoym-smaevnindga trioencosmanmdeinndvaotkioenbso tahndba isnicvsoekrev ibcoesth( eb.ga.s, ipcl usemrvbiicnegs a(ned.ge.,l epclturimcablirnegp aainrsd) 
aenledctermicaelr greepnacyirss)e ravnidce esm(ee.rgg.,epnocyli csee,rfivirceefisg (het.egr.,s )pwolhiceen, frierqefuigirhetde.rs) when required. 
33..22..33.. MMaannaaggeemmeenntt LLaayyeerr 
TThhiiss llaayyeerr uusseess mmaacchhiinnee lleeaarrnniinngg aanndd bbiigg ddaattaa ssttoorraaggee tteecchhnnoollooggiieess ttoo eeaassiillyy mmaannaaggee aanndd aannaallyyzzee 
tthhee ininfofromrmataiotinonco lcleocllteecdteind thine  dtehveic edleavyiecre.  Sliamyielar.r lyS, iimnfiolarmrlya,t ioinnfaocrcmesasticoonm macacnedsss acroemenmcaapnsdusl ataerde 
benyctahpesmulaanteadg ebmy etnhte lmayaenratgoeemnesnutr elaiynefor rtmo aetniosunrsee icnufroirtym. aTthioenm saecnuargietym. eTnhtel amyaernaaglseomidenent tliafiyeesr uaslseor 
bideehnatvifiioers puasettre brnehsaavnidorc plaasttseifirness ahnodm celassasicfcieosr dhionmgetso atchceoirrdeinnge rtgoy thceoinr seunmerpgyti ocnonpsautmteprntisonu spiantgtetrhnes 
AusPiIngo fthWe eAkPaI3 o.8f ,Wwehkiac h3.8is, wthheicshta ibsl ethve esrtsaibolne voef rtshioeno opfe nth-eso ouprecne-ssoouftrwcea rseofatnwdarseu acnceds ssfuuclclyesshfeullplys 
HheElpMsS H-IoETMcSo-ImoTp lycowmipthlyt hweitrhe qtuhier erdeqfuuinrcetdio fnuanlcittiieosn.aTliotiecsl.a sTsoif ycldasastiafya nddatga eannedra tgeenenereartgey e-snaevrignyg-
rseacvoinmgm reencodmatmioennsd, HatEioMnsS,- IHoTEMusSe-sIoaTn uospeesn asno uorpceenJ asvoaurimcep Jlaevmae inmtaptlieomn eonftaaltgioonri tohfm alCgo4.r5it,hwmh iCch4.i5s, 
twhheiJc4h8 ims tahceh iJn4e8 lmeaarcnhiinnge alelgaornriitnhgm a.lgCo4r.i5thamnd. CJ448.5 aarnedu sJ4e8d atoreg uesneedr attoe gdeenceisriaotne tdreeceiss,ioann dtrteheesy, aanrde 
cthlaesys iafircea ctiloanssaifligcoatriiothnm alsg. oCriltahsmsifis.c Catliaosnsiafilcgaotrioitnh malsgoarriethwmids ealrye uwseiddeilny hueseadlt hinca hreeaalnthdcahraev aenpdr ohvaevde 
tporoyvieeldd toou ytsitealdnd oiuntgstraensudlitnsgi nretshueltds iiang nthoes ids ioafghneopsiast iotifs h[5ep4]a,tcitains c[e5r4][,5 5ca–n58ce],r h[e5a5r–t5d8]i,s ehaesaert[ 5d9i]s,eeaysee 
d[5is9e],a seeyse[ 6d0i]s,eaansdest u[m60o]r, saonndd tiguimtaolrms aomnm doiggritaaml sm[6a1m].mInogardadmitsio [n6,1J]4.8 Ihna sadadbiettitoenr, pJe4r8fo hrmasa nac ebtehttaenr 
optehreforramlgaonrciteh tmhas,ns outchhera salrgaonrditohmmfso, rseuscth, C aAs rRaTnd[6o2m],  rfaonredsot,m CtAreReT,  f[u6z2z],y rCan-mdoeman tsr,eaen, dfuRzEzyP TCr-eme e[6a3n]s., 
and RHEEPMTSre-Ieo [T63w]a. s developed and implemented in a modular and generic way, with better application
extenHsiEbMilitSy-,IoeaTs ewoafsi mdpevleemloepnetdat iaonnd,  animdpwleimtheanvteidew into ah igmhopdeurlfaorr manadn ceg.enTehreict awskasyp, ewrfoitrhm beedttbeyr 
tahpepmlicaantaiogne mexetnetnlsaiybeilritcya,n eabseed oivf iidmedplienmtoenfotautriognro, uanpds: with a view to high performance. The tasks 
1p.erfoUrmseerd mbya nthaeg emmaennatg.emCeonmt plaryiseers cacnt iboen dsivsuidcehda isntdoe floeutirn groanudpse: diting user profiles and user
1. Uresgeirs trmaatinoang, eameontg. oCtohmerps.rises actions such as deleting and editing user profiles and user 
2. rHegoimsteramtioan,a agmemoneng to. tEhnercso. mpasses actions of data deletion, data editing, and management of
2. Hdomoe timc adneavgiceems,enatm. oEngcoomthpearsss.esIn atchtiiosnssu obf- mdoatdau dlee,lewtieond,e vdealtoap eeditainga, natnhdo lmogaynaogfedmoemnot toicf 
dreosmouortcice sd, aevs irceecso,m ameondge dotihnemrsu. lItnip tlheirse seuabr-cmh owdourlkes, [w64e– 6d9e]v. eTloptheids eannd a, wntehuolsoegdya osuf bdvoemrsoiotinc 
resources, as recommended in multiple research works [64–69]. To this end, we used a 
subversion of the web ontology language (OWL), the OWL-DL, which is based on the SHI2 
description logic. Likewise, OWL-DL has a broad vocabulary and greater expressiveness than 
RDFS. Figure 3 depicts a fragment of the developed ontology, which present the main domotic 
concepts, such as home activity, environment, entity and stay, among others. 
 
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 10 of 24
of the web ontology language (OWL), the OWL-DL, which is based on the SHI2 description
logic. Likewise, OWL-DL has a broad vocabulary and greater expressiveness than RDFS. Figure 3
depicts a fragment of the developed ontology, which present the main domotic concepts, such as
home activity, environment, entity and stay, among others. We also followed the Methontology
method to develop the home automation ontology [70]. That is, we conducted different operations,
each based on particular aspects of the conceptual model of knowledge: relationships, terms,
axioms, taxonomy, rules, and mathematical approximations of elements.
3. Recommender system. This system issues recommendations for energy saving and home comfort
based on home residents’ behavioral patterns. To this end, the system takes into account both
daily and average energy consumption values from each domotic device, which allows the system
to generate the rules in the algorithm. Therefore, smart homes are classified on a daily basis
with respect to four energy consumption categories: normal, low, medium, and high. Once the
classification is performed with the J48 algorithm, the rules are established according to energy
consumption categories. In this sense, energy consumption is calculated with respect to the
number domotic devices connected in a home, the average number of home residents, and the
season (spring, summer, autumn, and winter). The algorithm rules identify and indicate how the
energy-saving recommendation process works. We also used Apache Mahout and RuleML to
generate energy-saving recommendations. Apache Mahout is a free software library that supports
the scalable implementation of machine learning algorithms. On the other hand, RuleML is
based on XML (Extensible Markup Language), which is used for the immediate exchange of
rules. Finally, the recommender system of HEMS-IoT not only issues recommendations, but it
also suggests IoT services to solve safety problems.
4. Dashboard. This displays graphical representations (charts) of the main smart home indicators
(electricity, gas, or water consumption) and resident habits.
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 10 of 24 
  
(a) (b) 
FigureFi3g.uDreo m3. oDtiocmoonttiocl ognyto: l(oag)yF:r (aag)m Freangtm1,e(nbt) 1F,r (abg)m Freangtm2.ent 2. 
The tWeche naolsloog foielslouwseedd itnheth Me estyhsotenmtoaloregyv emryetihmopdo trot adnetv, ebleocpa uthsee hthoemyea laluowtomHaEtMioSn- IoonTtotlooagnya [l7y0z]e. That 
and displaisy, wvies ucoanl dreupcrteesde ndtifafteiorennst oofpeenraetrigoynsc,o enascuhm bpastieodn o. nT pharortuicguhlatrh eassepecchtas rotsf ,thues ecrosnccaenptmuaalk me odel 
sound eneorfg kyn-soawvilnedggdee: criesliaotniosnasnhdiptsh,u tserompsti,m axizioemens,e tragxyocnoonmsuym, rputlieosn, ainndth meiarthheomaetsi.cal approximations 
of elements. 
3. Recommender system. This system issues recommendations for energy saving and home 
comfort based on home residents’ behavioral patterns. To this end, the system takes into account 
both daily and average energy consumption values from each domotic device, which allows the 
system to generate the rules in the algorithm. Therefore, smart homes are classified on a daily 
basis with respect to four energy consumption categories: normal, low, medium, and high. Once 
the classification is performed with the J48 algorithm, the rules are established according to 
energy consumption categories. In this sense, energy consumption is calculated with respect to 
the number domotic devices connected in a home, the average number of home residents, and 
the season (spring, summer, autumn, and winter). The algorithm rules identify and indicate how 
the energy-saving recommendation process works. We also used Apache Mahout and RuleML 
to generate energy-saving recommendations. Apache Mahout is a free software library that 
supports the scalable implementation of machine learning algorithms. On the other hand, 
RuleML is based on XML (Extensible Markup Language), which is used for the immediate 
exchange of rules. Finally, the recommender system of HEMS-IoT not only issues 
recommendations, but it also suggests IoT services to solve safety problems. 
4. Dashboard. This displays graphical representations (charts) of the main smart home indicators 
(electricity, gas, or water consumption) and resident habits. 
The technologies used in the system are very important, because they allow HEMS-IoT to 
analyze and display visual representations of energy consumption. Through these charts, users can 
make sound energy-saving decisions and thus optimize energy consumption in their homes. 
3.2.4. IoT Services Layer 
This layer provides various REST-based web services to communicate with both the application 
layer and the management layer. Consequently, HEMS-IoT users can easily interact with the system's 
functionalities. The main components in this layer are described below: 
• REST API. REST collects information or performs operations on such information in all possible 
formats, such as JSON and XML, using HTTP. REST is a good option if compared to other 
protocols for information exchange, such as the Simple Object Access Protocol (SOAP), which 
has a high capacity but is complicated. 
 
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 11 of 24
3.2.4. IoT Services Layer
This layer provides various REST-based web services to communicate with both the application
layer and the management layer. Consequently, HEMS-IoT users can easily interact with the system’s
functionalities. The main components in this layer are described below:
• REST API. REST collects information or performs operations on such information in all possible
formats, such as JSON and XML, using HTTP. REST is a good option if compared to other protocols
for information exchange, such as the Simple Object Access Protocol (SOAP), which has a high
capacity but is complicated.
• Service selector. This module validates the parameters passed on by the presentation layer and
choosing the required services. Likewise, the service selector has the power to either give or deny
services, according to the authentication data and received parameters.
3.2.5. Security Layer
This layer guarantees data confidentiality and can retrieve data protected by both the device layer
and the end users. The communication layer and the administration layer facilitate communication
between the security layer and the device layer. This layer considers two security components,
authorization and authentication, described below:
• Authentication. This refers to the act of validating with evidence that something/someone is
what/who they claim to be. Object/device authentication involves ensure its origin, whereas
confirming user identity usually implies user authentication. In HEMS-IoT, user authentication
requires ensuring that the user who wishes to interact with the system is truly who he/she claims
to be. When this is the case, HEMS-IoT authorizes said user to access the system.
• Authorization. This occurs after user identity is authenticated by the system. The goal of
authorization mechanisms is to protect user information and prevent unauthorized or unidentified
users from accessing data or performing particular tasks. Authorization and authentication
are different, since authorization involves the tasks that users are allowed to perform or the
information that can access once their identity is confirmed. User authorization is applied either
to individual elements or to a set of them. In smart home management systems, each element
relates to an activity to be run.
3.2.6. Presentation Layer
As a mobile application, HEMS-IoT works on the Android operating system. Figure 4a illustrates
the application’s menu list on the presentation layer. The main menu options include home (i.e.,
return to the initial screen), favorites (rapidly access preferred rooms), statistics (visualize energy
consumption patterns), rooms (view home rooms), and devices (visualize domotic devices and sensors
connected to the smart home). Additionally, the application’s menu allows users to add and remove
devices or rooms, view existing user profiles, consult and change application settings, and exit the
application. Figure 4b illustrates examples of comfort, safety, and energy-saving recommendations
issued by HEMS-IoT.
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 11 of 24 
• Service selector. This module validates the parameters passed on by the presentation layer and 
choosing the required services. Likewise, the service selector has the power to either give or 
deny services, according to the authentication data and received parameters. 
3.2.5. Security Layer 
This layer guarantees data confidentiality and can retrieve data protected by both the device 
layer and the end users. The communication layer and the administration layer facilitate 
communication between the security layer and the device layer. This layer considers two security 
components, authorization and authentication, described below: 
• Authentication. This refers to the act of validating with evidence that something/someone is 
what/who they claim to be. Object/device authentication involves ensure its origin, whereas 
confirming user identity usually implies user authentication. In HEMS-IoT, user authentication 
requires ensuring that the user who wishes to interact with the system is truly who he/she claims 
to be. When this is the case, HEMS-IoT authorizes said user to access the system. 
• Authorization. This occurs after user identity is authenticated by the system. The goal of 
authorization mechanisms is to protect user information and prevent unauthorized or 
unidentified users from accessing data or performing particular tasks. Authorization and 
authentication are different, since authorization involves the tasks that users are allowed to 
perform or the information that can access once their identity is confirmed. User authorization 
is applied either to individual elements or to a set of them. In smart home management systems, 
each element relates to an activity to be run. 
3.2.6. Presentation Layer 
As a mobile application, HEMS-IoT works on the Android operating system. Figure 4a illustrates 
the application’s menu list on the presentation layer. The main menu options include home (i.e., 
return to the initial screen), favorites (rapidly access preferred rooms), statistics (visualize energy 
consumption patterns), rooms (view home rooms), and devices (visualize domotic devices and 
sensors connected to the smart home). Additionally, the application’s menu allows users to add and 
Erneemrgioesv2e0 2d0e, v13i,c1e0s9 7or rooms, view existing user profiles, consult and change application setting1s2, oafn2d4  
exit the application. Figure 4b illustrates examples of comfort, safety, and energy-saving 
recommendations issued by HEMS-IoT. 
Energies 2020, 13, 1097  12 of 25  
(a) (b) 
Figure 5a shows a yearly graph and a weekly graph generated by HEMS-IoT. Graphs allow 
application users tFFoiig guuvrrieesu 44.a. IlIninztteer rffaeaccneeessr oogffy H EEcoMnSSs--IuIoomTT::p ((atai))o Mn eennduua,,t (a(bb )) dRRaeeciclooym, mweeneneddkaatltiyioo,n nssm.. onthly, or yearly. 
Additionally, as Figure 5b illustrates, the HEMS-IoT mobile app provides a set of user interfaces for 
homeF iirgeusrirdee 55naats ss thoo vwisesw aa  yayneeadar rlrleyq ggurreaaspt hb aaasnicd s aae rwvieeceeekksl layv ggariralaapbhle g giene nteehrrea tItoedT  (bey.g H., EpMluSm--IIboinT.g.  Garnraadp ehlsse caatllrlliocwal  
araeppppalliiicrcasat)ti.io oTnnhu asuneskressr tstoo  vttohis eu vauilssizuee aoleifnz Ieo rTge ynteeccorhgnnysou lmcoogpnitesious nmandpdatti oamnda acdihlyain,tawe  eldeeaakrillnyy,i,nm gwo tneetechkhllyny,i,qo rumeysoe,an HrtlhyEl.yMA, Sdo-dIroi tTiyo ehnaearlllpys,.  
ar sesFiidgeunrtes 5btoi llmusotnraittoesr , tthheeiHr EsMmSa-rIto Thommoebsil eeaapsiplyp raonvdid eisn arseeatl-otfimusee rainndte rpfarcoevsidfoers heonmeergryes-sidavenintsg 
troecvoiemwmaennddraetqiouness tabcacsoircdsienrgvliyc.e s available in the IoT (e.g., plumbing and electrical repairs). Thanks to
the us e of IoT technologies and machine learning techniques, HEMS-IoT helps residents to monitor
their  smart homes easily and in real-time and provides energy-saving recommendations accordingly.
 
  
(a) (b) 
FFiigguurree 55.. IInntteerrffaacceess ooff HHEEMMSS--IIooTT:: ((aa)) SSttaattiissttiiccss,, ((bb)) IIooTT sseerrvviicceess.. 
IInn tthhee lliigghhtt ooff aa fifirree oorr ssaaffeettyy pprroobblelemmss,, tthhee ssyysstteemm inintteelllliiggeennttllyy rreeqquueessttss eemmeerrggeennccyy sseerrvviicceess 
((ppoolliiccee oorr fifirree sseerrvviicceess)),,n noottiiffyyiinnggh hoommeer reessidideenntstso offt htheep poossssibibleler risiskk. . 
3.3. Case Study: Monitoring a Smart Home to Ensure Indoor Comfort and Safety and Reduce Energy 
Consumption 
In this section, we introduce a case study to validate HEMS-IoT in the smart home’s comfort, 
safety, and energy saving. The case study depicts how a home resident can monitor user energy 
patterns and total energy consumption in their smart home and how HEMS-IoT can generate energy-
saving recommendations accordingly. Overall, the case study scenario can be described as follows: 
• A smart house equipped with six sensors—a water flow sensor, an energy control sensor, a gas 
sensor, a motion sensor, a sound sensor, and a temperature sensor—needs to be monitored to 
ensure it provides its residents with appropriate comfort and safety while simultaneously 
reducing energy consumption. 
Figure 6 introduces a visual representation of the scenario. As can be observed, home data and/or 
events are monitored through the six sensors, which send the data and/or events to a synchronized 
gateway. This mechanism ensures that the appropriate information is sent to each sensor supplier. 
Subsequently, HEMS-IoT requests home data from each sensor supplier to ensure indoor comfort 
and issue energy-saving recommendations according to the resident’s preferences. HEMS-IoT 
receives and analyzes the data to identify 1) energy consumption patterns, 2) possible problems 
within the normal operation of the house, such as water or gas leaks and electrical failures (which 
may increase energy consumption), and 3) possible emergencies compromising home security and 
integrity (e.g., flood, fire, burglary attempt). If a problem requires requesting a basic service, HEMS-
 
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 13 of 24
3.3. Case Study: Monitoring a Smart Home to Ensure Indoor Comfort and Safety and Reduce
Energy Consumption
In this section, we introduce a case study to validate HEMS-IoT in the smart home’s comfort, safety,
and energy saving. The case study depicts how a home resident can monitor user energy patterns
and total energy consumption in their smart home and how HEMS-IoT can generate energy-saving
recommendations accordingly. Overall, the case study scenario can be described as follows:
• A smart house equipped with six sensors—a water flow sensor, an energy control sensor, a gas
sensor, a motion sensor, a sound sensor, and a temperature sensor—needs to be monitored to
ensure it provides its residents with appropriate comfort and safety while simultaneously reducing
energy consumption.
Figure 6 introduces a visual representation of the scenario. As can be observed, home data and/or
events are monitored through the six sensors, which send the data and/or events to a synchronized
gateway. This mechanism ensures that the appropriate information is sent to each sensor supplier.
Subsequently, HEMS-IoT requests home data from each sensor supplier to ensure indoor comfort and
issue energy-saving recommendations according to the resident’s preferences. HEMS-IoT receives
and analyzes the data to identify (1) energy consumption patterns, (2) possible problems within the
normal operation of the house, such as water or gas leaks and electrical failures (which may increase
energy consumption), and (3) possible emergencies compromising home security and integrity (e.g.,
flood, fire, burglary attempt). If a problem requires requesting a basic service, HEMS-IoT locates
available basic service providers to handle the request. Then, the system notifies the user of the
problem and displays basic information of each provider (i.e., name, address, telephone number, open
hours, costs, and references, among others). The user can then choose their preferred provider and
sEennerdgisest 2h0e20s,e 1r3v, 1ic0e97c onfirmation to the system to notify the corresponding provider, so that the s1e3r ovfi c2e4 
request is answered. Conversely, if HEMS-IoT identifies a safety emergency, it automatically invokes
aanuteomeartgiceanlcly isnevrvoikceesp arno veimdeerrg(penocliyc esesrevrivciec ep,rfiorveidseerrv (ipcoe)libcey sseernvdicine,g fbiraes iscerdvaitcae)o nbyt hseenhdoiunsge b(ea.sgic., 
addadtar eosns, tthyep ehoouf seem (eer.g.e, nacdyd, trheessd, atytapea nodf /eomr eevrgenentsceym, tihttee dabtya tahneds/eonr seovresn, otsw enmerit)t.ed by the sensors, 
owner). 
 
FFiiggurree 66.. SScceennaarriioo:: Moonniittoorriinngg aa ssmaarrtt hhooussee.. 
TThhee ssyysstteemm ssiimmuullttaanneeoouussllyy nnoottiiffiieess tthhee hhoommee rreessiiddeenntt ooff tthhee eemmeerrggeennccyy ttoo hheellpp tthheemm ttaakkee tthhee 
nneecceessssaarryy mmeeaassuurreess,, ddeeppeennddiinngg oonn wwhheetthheerr tthheeyy aarree iinn tthhee hhoouussee oorr nnoott.. 
Methodology
3.3.1. Methodology 
The main goal of the case study is to calculate energy consumption in smart homes and classify
The main goal of the case study is to calculate energy consumption in smart homes and classify 
consumption rates with respect to what HEMS-IoT sets as a normal energy consumption level. The
consumption rates with respect to what HEMS-IoT sets as a normal energy consumption level. The 
case study was conducted among ten houses from a Mexican residential complex. The houses were 
of two types, as listed in Table 1. As can be observed, the first home design is smaller than the second 
one, and this difference lies in the number of bedrooms: the houses with the first design had two 
bedrooms, whereas those with the second design had three bedrooms. The first house design is 
suitable for three residents, while the second house design is appropriate for four people. All the 
houses had at last two smart plugs. The ten houses were equipped with sensors to visualize and 
document data such as motion and room location, lighting, and temperature. The sensors collected 
and sent the data to the data layer every 30 seconds, thus generating more than 2500 data per day. 
Table 1. House design and characteristics. 
 Smart Home 1 Smart Home 2 
Two lamps, one light, one TV, and Two lamps, one light, one TV, and one air 
Room 1 
one air conditioner conditioner 
One computer, one TV, one iron, One computer, one TV, one ceiling fan, and 
Room 2 
and one light one light 
Room 3 Not applicable Two lights and one iron 
Living One ceiling fan, two lights, and one One ceiling fan, one video game console, one 
room TV television, and two lights  
Dinner 
Two lights and one ceiling fan One ceiling fan and two lights 
room 
One electric stove, one refrigerator, One electric stove, one refrigerator, one 
Kitchen 
one blender, and two lights microwave, one blender, and two lights 
Since it was important to determine energy consumption in the smart homes both before and 
after using HEMS-IoT, we applied the following methodology: 
 
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 14 of 24
case study was conducted among ten houses from a Mexican residential complex. The houses were of
two types, as listed in Table 1. As can be observed, the first home design is smaller than the second one,
and this difference lies in the number of bedrooms: the houses with the first design had two bedrooms,
whereas those with the second design had three bedrooms. The first house design is suitable for three
residents, while the second house design is appropriate for four people. All the houses had at last
two smart plugs. The ten houses were equipped with sensors to visualize and document data such as
motion and room location, lighting, and temperature. The sensors collected and sent the data to the
data layer every 30 seconds, thus generating more than 2500 data per day.
Table 1. House design and characteristics.
Smart Home 1 Smart Home 2
Room 1 Two lamps, one light, one TV, and one Two lamps, one light, one TV, and oneair conditioner air conditioner
Room 2 One computer, one TV, one iron, and One computer, one TV, one ceiling fan,one light and one light
Room 3 Not applicable Two lights and one iron
Living room One ceiling fan, two lights, and one TV One ceiling fan, one video game console,one television, and two lights
Dinner room Two lights and one ceiling fan One ceiling fan and two lights
Kitchen One electric stove, one refrigerator, one One electric stove, one refrigerator, oneblender, and two lights microwave, one blender, and two lights
Since it was important to determine energy consumption in the smart homes both before and
after using HEMS-IoT, we applied the following methodology:
• The first monitoring period (before using HEMS-IoT) lasted eight months, from mid-January to
mid-September 2018. All the residents were asked to interact with their domotic devices normally
without paying particular attention to energy consumption or using HEMS-IoT. At this stage,
energy consumption in each home was noted as stated in the electricity bills, which are issued by
Mexican electricity company CFE, by its Spanish acronym.
• The smart home residents were given the HEMS-IoT manual to learn how to use the application.
The manual is a written guide of the HEMS-IoT application, as it describes all the system’s
functionalities that help control domotic devices and visualize energy consumption patterns.
• The second monitoring period (while using HEMS-IoT) also lasted eight months, from mid-January
to mid-September 2019. During this period, the smart home residents used their domotic devices
normally but were also asked to follow the system’s recommendations for energy saving, which
took into account their own indoor comfort preferences. Note that every time a recommendation
is accepted in HEMS-IoT, the system executes the necessary operations to control and program
the domotic devices accordingly.
• During the second monitoring period, data on energy consumption was collected thanks to
HEMS-IoT’s device layer, but also through the CFE bills. The data collected in this second
period helped us identify energy consumption patterns following the use of HEMS-IoT and
its recommendations.
• The data were analyzed through big data analysis technologies to recognize usage patterns
across domotic devices, home comfort preferences, and house problems or security risks. Then,
thanks to the J48 machine learning algorithm, home residents, domotic devices, and smart
homes were classified with respect to energy consumption levels. HEMS-IoT relies on the
J48 machine learning algorithm that uses the 10-fold cross-validation technique to achieve a
predictive model. This validation technique is widely recommended for accurate estimates due
to its low variance and low risk of bias [71]. Additionally, the J48 machine learning algorithm
has demonstrated better performance than other algorithms [72–74]. Finally, to generate the
energy-saving recommendations, HEMS-IoT uses both Apache Mahout and RuleML. Note that
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 15 of 24
some system recommendations are in the form of requests for IoT services (either basic or
emergency services).
• To determine whether HEMS-IoT actually managed to reduce energy consumption in the
ten smart homes, we compared the data collected during the first monitoring period
(mid-January to mid-September 2018) with those collected in the second period (mid-January to
mid-September 2019).
4. Results and Discussion
HEMS-IoT gives home residents a more significant expectation of energy consumption in smart
homes, because it collects deeper data through its service layer using machine learning and big data
technologies. In this section, we analyze the data collected by HEMS-IoT during the case study to
identify energy consumption patterns and understand the circumstances encouraging such patterns.
Additionally, we propose a series of energy-saving actions and we present a user-centered evaluation.
4.1. Data Analysis
We conducted daily, weekly, and monthly data analyses to identify trends in energy consumption.
Due to missing data, we used the average aggregation technique to calculate the average of the original
valuation and transfer this value to a lower frequency. According to experts, this technique has
yielded remarkable results when applied in sensor networks [75–77]. Next, we analyzed the HEMS-IoT
recommendations. Likewise, we organized energy consumption data by establishing a continuous
order, and we assigned 0 as the daily energy consumption value to domotic devices not used on a
daily basis, such as irons.
Regarding room lighting and temperature, we found that 12.5% to 22.5% of the total energy is
consumed by air conditioning systems. Also, our results reveal that during the first months of the
second monitoring period, home residents still seemed to pay little attention to how much power
they were using; that is, we found evidence of excessive use of the air conditioners and lights on in
empty rooms. We also identified smart homes where energy consumption levels were higher when
the residents were absent. This phenomenon was particularly visible in households with children. In
the end, these homes were classified into the low/poor energy consumption efficiency category as a
result of the cluster analysis. We also identified two smart homes where energy consumption was
disproportionate with respect to the number of inhabitants. This phenomenon might be explained by
the use of the air conditioners.
To identify energy consumption patterns, we conducted a daily analysis by paying close attention
to the time of the year: spring, summer, fall, and winter. Overall, we found that daily energy
consumption was higher at night and in the afternoon than in the morning. Likewise, we found that
some hours can be important indicators of daily energy consumption in smart homes. Our results
also indicate that energy use levels vary significantly across seasons. Undoubtedly, the demand for
electric energy increased during the winter (use of heaters) and decreased during the summer (use of
air conditioners). Finally, our results confirm that during the school summer break (July - August),
energy consumption in smart homes with the second design significantly increased due to video
game consoles.
Our analysis of smart home energy consumption also led us to propose a series of energy-saving
recommendations that can help residents cut energy waste and lower energy bills. Overall, it is very
important to pay close careful to the use of both room lights and air conditioning systems. According
to Mexico’s Energy Ministry (SENER, by its Spanish acronym), both cause a great deal of electricity
waste. We also conducted a simulation of IoT service requests, since this system functionality was
not exploited during the case study. The results obtained from the simulation were satisfactory, thus
confirming that HEMS-IoT is well prepared to invoke IoT services as soon as the suppliers adopt this
new paradigm.
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 15 of 24 
second monitoring period, home residents still seemed to pay little attention to how much power 
they were using; that is, we found evidence of excessive use of the air conditioners and lights on in 
empty rooms. We also identified smart homes where energy consumption levels were higher when 
the residents were absent. This phenomenon was particularly visible in households with children. In 
the end, these homes were classified into the low/poor energy consumption efficiency category as a 
result of the cluster analysis. We also identified two smart homes where energy consumption was 
disproportionate with respect to the number of inhabitants. This phenomenon might be explained by 
the use of the air conditioners. 
EnergiTeso2 02id0,e1n3t, i1f0y9 7energy consumption patterns, we conducted a daily analysis by paying 16cloofs2e4 
attention to the time of the year: spring, summer, fall, and winter. Overall, we found that daily energy 
consumption was higher at night and in the afternoon than in the morning. Likewise, we found that 
4.2. Comparison Results and Findings
some hours can be important indicators of daily energy consumption in smart homes. Our results 
also iDnduircinatge theatc eansersgtyu duys,e wleeveglsa tvhaerrye dsigeneifrigcaynctloyn asucrmospst isoenasdoantsa. Ubenfdooreubthteedrlye,s itdhen dtsemusaend  tfhoer 
eHleEcMtrSic- IeonTeargpyp lincactrieoans,ebdu dt ualrsiongw thiele wthineytewr (eureseu osifn hgeiatt.eArss) aanreds udlet,cwreeasceodn ducrtiendg athbee fsourme-amnedr- a(uftseer 
ocof maipr acroinsodnittionideresn)t.i Ffyindailfflyer, eonucre rsebseutlwtse ceonntfhiremtw tohamt odnuirtionrgin tghpe esrcihoodosl( smuimd-mJaenru bareyatko (mJuildy- S- eAputegmubste)r, 
e2n01e8rgvys .cmonidsu-Jmanputiaorny tion msmida-rSte hpotemebse rw2it0h1 9t)h. eS isnecceonindM dexsicgon esnigerngiyficbainlltslya rienicsrseuaesdedo ndaueb itmo ovnitdheloy 
gbamsise, coounrsaonleasl.y sis follows the same trend. According to our results, visually depicted in Figure 7,
HEMOS-uIro Tanraeldyuscise sofe nsmeragryt choonmsuem enpetirogny fcronmsu4m2 kpWtiohnt aols9o0 lkeWd huse vtoe rpyrotwposme ao nsethrise.sW oef eantterrigbuy-tseatvhiensge 
recsuomltsmtoenthdeatfiaocntst hthaatts cmaanr ht ehlopm resriedseindtesn ctsutf oelnloewrgeyd wthaesten aenrdgy l-oswaveirn egnreercgoym bmillesn. dOavteioranlsl,i ists uise vdebry 
iHmEpMorSt-aIonTt .toA pdadyit icolonsaell cy,awreefuble tloie tvhee tuhsaet othf ebsoatthis rfoaoctmor lyigrhestsu altnsdw aeirre caolnsodidtiuoentiongth seysfotellmows. iAngccaosrpdeicntgs: 
to Mexico’s Energy Ministry (SENER, by its Spanish acronym), both cause a great deal of electricity 
w• asteIn. tWeree satlsfroo cmonsdmuacrttedh oam siemrueslaidtieonnt sofin IocTu tsteinrvgiceen erergqyuewstass, tsei,nacne dthdisis scyipstleinme ftuoncchtaionngaelietyn ewrgays 
not ecxopnlosuitmedp dtiuorninhga bthites .case study. The results obtained from the simulation were satisfactory, thus 
c•onfiArmdienqgu athteata HndEMopSti-mIoaTl iuss we eolfl dporempoatriecdd teov iicnevso, kpea rItoiTcu slearrvlyictehso asse swooitnh ahsi gthee rsudpemplaienrds faodroepnte trhgiys, 
new spuacrhadaisgamir conditioners (e.g., limiting room temperature to 20–25 ◦. C and setting automatic device
shutdown for empty rooms).
4•.2. CAomccpeaprtiasonnc eRoesfuHltsE aMnSd -FIoinTdirnegcos mmendations for energy saving. Energy consumption is highly
dependent on resident behavior. In this sense, the performance of our system is bound to whether
During the case study, we gathered energy consumption data before the residents used the 
residents follow HEMS-IoT recommendations. For instance, our results reveal behavioral changes
HEMS-IoT application, but also while they were using it. As a result, we conducted a before-and-
with respect to the use of the air conditioner. Initially, these were used for longer periods of time,
after comparison to identify differences between the two monitoring periods (mid-January to mid-
even in empty rooms; however, during the second monitoring period, we found evidence that
September 2018 vs. mid-January to mid-September 2019). S◦ince in Mexico energy bills are issued on residents limited air conditioner temperatures to 18–24 C and set the application to automatically
a bimonthly basis, our analysis follows the same trend. According to our results, visually depicted in 
turn the air conditioner off once the room was empty.
Figure 7, HEMS-IoT reduces energy consumption from 42 kWh to 90 kWh every two months. We 
a•ttribSumtea rtthheosme e rreessuidltesn tstow hthoea ccfaecptt edthmato rsemHaErMt Sh-oIomTer erceosmidmenentsd aftoiollnoswaendd cthhaen geenderthgeyi-rsahvoimnge 
recomaumtoemndaatitoionnhs aibssitusemd abnya gHeEdMtoS-bIeotTte. rAcdudt itthieoinraelnlye,r gwye wbaesliteev. e that the satisfactory results were 
also due to the following aspects: 
 
Figure 7. Energy consumption comparison.
Figure 7. Energy consumption comparison. 
4.3. User-Centered Evaluation
 
It is very important that mobile applications achieve their goals regarding end-user satisfaction,
which depends largely on quality aspects such as design, service, assistance, utility, and usability.
On the other hand, to evaluate recommender systems, precision and accuracy metrics are widely
used in the literature. However, several researchers have identified that the use of recommendation
systems that provide personalized assistance to find relevant information generates a high perception
of satisfaction [78,79]. In this regard, it is necessary to investigate recommendation systems from
a user-centered perspective [80]. Therefore, the HEMS-IoT system was evaluated through the
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 16 of 24 
• Interest from smart home residents in cutting energy waste, and discipline to change energy 
consumption habits. 
• Adequate and optimal use of domotic devices, particularly those with higher demand for 
energy, such as air conditioners (e.g., limiting room temperature to 20–25°C and setting 
automatic device shutdown for empty rooms). 
• Acceptance of HEMS-IoT recommendations for energy saving. Energy consumption is highly 
dependent on resident behavior. In this sense, the performance of our system is bound to 
whether residents follow HEMS-IoT recommendations. For instance, our results reveal 
behavioral changes with respect to the use of the air conditioner. Initially, these were used for 
longer periods of time, even in empty rooms; however, during the second monitoring period, 
we found evidence that residents limited air conditioner temperatures to 18–24 °C and set the 
application to automatically turn the air conditioner off once the room was empty.  
• Smart home residents who accepted more HEMS-IoT recommendations and changed their home 
automation habits managed to better cut their energy waste. 
4.3. User-Centered Evaluation 
It is very important that mobile applications achieve their goals regarding end-user satisfaction, 
which depends largely on quality aspects such as design, service, assistance, utility, and usability. On 
the other hand, to evaluate recommender systems, precision and accuracy metrics are widely used in 
the literature. However, several researchers have identified that the use of recommendation systems 
Ethneartg iepsr2o0v20i,d1e3 ,p10e9r7sonalized assistance to find relevant information generates a high percepti1o7no f o24f 
satisfaction [78,79]. In this regard, it is necessary to investigate recommendation systems from a user-
cUesnetre-rCeedn ptreicrsEpveacltuivaeti o[8n0]F.r Tamheerwefoorrke,f othreR HecEoMmSm-IeonTd esyr sStyesmte wmass[ 8e1v]awluhaitcehd itshbraosuegdho tnhea Uthseeorr-yCeanbtoruict 
Ehuvamluanatbioenh aFvriaomr tehwaot rcka nfobre Ruesceodminmseitnudaetrio Snyssstuemchs a[s8t1h] ewuhseicohf ias sbpaesceidfi cosny sat etmhe.ory about human 
behavTihoer tohvaetr caalln gboea ul soefdt ihni ssiltausattieovnasl usuatciho nasw thaes utosem ofe aa ssupreecitfhice suysseterm’s . perception of HEMS-IoT
regarTdhine gotvheeraqlul agliotayl oofft htheirse claosmt meveanlduaattiioonn swgeans etroa tmedeabsyutrhee tshyes tuesmer,'tsh peelercveepltoiofnsa otifs fHacEtiMonS,-ItohTe 
reegeacrtidviennge tshse,  aqnudaltihtye  ionft ethneti orenctoomumsee.nFdiagtuiorens8 gdeenpeicratstetdh ebtyh ethoere styicsatel mm,o tdheel luesveedl oinf tshaitsisefaxcpteiorinm, the ff ent.
eSfpfeeccitfiivceanlleys,st,h aenhdy tphoet ihnetseenstiaoinm toto uesxe.p Flaiginurthe e8 pdeerpciecitvse tdher ethcoemormetiecnadl amtioodneql uuaselidty inb ythtihs eexupseerriambeonutt. 
Sthpeeceinfiecraglyly-s, athvien hgyrpeocothmemseesn adimat itoon emxpeltahiond thaes wpeerlcleaisvehdo wrecpoemrcmeiveneddaqtuioanli tqyuianlflituye bnyc etsheth uesseyr satebmou’st 
tehee cetniveregnye-sssaavnindgt hreecsoamtimsfaecntdioantiopner mceeivtheoddb ayst wheelul saesr .hFouwr tpheerrcmeiovreed,  tqhuisaleixtyp einrifmlueenntcecos nthsied seyrsetdemth'es ff
eufsfeerc’tsivinenteenstsi oanndto thues esa[8ti2s]f,aacitmioinn pgetrocdeievteedrm biyn tehief tuhseers.y Fsutermth’esremoerceti,v tehnis eff essxpanerdimtheenut sceorn’ssipdeerrceediv tehde 
usasteirs'fsa icntitoennthioanv etoa upsoes [i8ti2v]e, ainimfluinegn ctoe odnetuersmerisnteo icf othneti nsyuseteumsi’nsg eftfheectHivEeMneSs-sI oaTndsy tshtee mus.er's perceived 
satisfaction have a positive influence on users to continue using the HEMS-IoT system. 
 
Figure 8. User-centered theoretical model.
Figure 8. User-centered theoretical model. 
The people involved in this case study (21 women and 14 men between 18 and 59 years) were
The people involved in this case study (21 women and 14 men between 18 and 59 years) were 
asked questions to measure their experience and perceptions using HEMS- IoT. The questionnaire
asked questions to measure their experience and perceptions using HEMS- IoT. The questionnaire 
used in this work was adapted from standardized data collection instruments focused on measuring
used in this work was adapted from standardized data collection instruments focused on measuring 
user-system interaction.
user-system interaction.  
Specifically, the questionnaire used in [81] was slightly adapted to identify the user’s perception
Specifically, the questionnaire used in [81] was slightly adapted to identify the user's perception 
regarding perceived satisfaction, perceived system effectiveness, and the quality of energy-saving
regarding perceived satisfaction, perceived system effectiveness, and the quality of energy-saving 
recommendations. Meanwhile, the questionnaire proposed in [82] was used to measure the perceived
recommendations. Meanwhile, the questionnaire proposed in [82] was used to measure the perceived 
recommendation quality, and the questionnaires presented in [83] and [84] were used to identify the
 user’s intention to use. Table 2 describes the final questionnaire, which is based on a five-point Likert
scale ("Strongly disagree" to "Strongly agree") that helps quantify user satisfaction. Table 3 describes
the results obtained for the perceived recommendation quality (PRQ) of the users, the perceived
satisfaction (PS), perceived system effectiveness (PSE), as well as their intention to use (ITU). As can be
observed, the average results were 3.81 for PRQ, 3.45 for PS, 2.98 for PSE, and 4.07 for ITU.
Table 2. Questionnaire.
Perceived Recommendation Quality Perceived System Effectiveness
1. I like the energy-saving recommendations provided by
HEMS-IoT. 11. The system is useful.
2. The energy-saving recommendations fit my comfort 12. The system makes me more aware of energy
preferences. consumption at home.
3. The energy-saving recommendations provided by 13. I make better energy-saving decisions with
HEMS-IoT were well chosen. HEMS-IoT.
4. The energy-saving recommendations were relevant. 14. I can have better energy savings without useHEMS-IoT.
5. The system provided various inefficient energy-saving 15. I can decrease the cost of energy
recommendations. consumption using HEMS-IoT.
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 18 of 24
Table 2. Cont.
Perceived Satisfaction Intention to Use
6. I like the energy-saving recommendations I have 16. I will use this system again for energy
accepted. saving.
7. I am comfortable with the energy-saving 17. I will use this system more frequently for
recommendations accepted. energy saving.
8. I feel happy to have a more efficient energy 18. I will tell my friends or acquaintances about
consumption. this system.
9. I would recommend some of the energy-saving 19. I am very likely to use this system for energy
recommendations I have accepted to friends or family. savings at home.
10. The energy-saving recommendations fit my comfort 20. I am very likely that I would recommend my
preferences. family to use this system.
Table 3. Results of the user-centered evaluation.
User PRQ PS PSE ITU
HU1 3.8 3.2 3.2 3.8
HU2 3.8 3.2 2.6 4.4
HU3 4.2 3.4 3.2 3.8
HU4 3.6 3.6 3.2 3.8
HU5 3.4 3.2 3.2 3.8
HU6 3.8 3.2 3.2 4.2
HU7 3.6 3.4 2.8 3.8
HU8 4.2 3.2 3.2 4.4
HU9 3.4 3.4 2.6 3.8
HU10 3.6 3.2 3.2 4.2
HU11 4.2 3.2 2.8 4.2
HU12 3.6 3.4 2.8 3.8
HU13 3.8 3.4 2.8 3.8
HU14 3.8 3.2 2.8 4.2
HU15 3.6 3.4 3.2 4.2
HU16 3.6 3.2 2.8 4.2
HU17 3.6 3.4 2.6 4.2
HU18 3.8 3.2 3.2 4.2
HU19 4.2 4.2 3.2 3.8
HU20 3.8 3.6 2.8 4.2
HU21 3.8 3.6 3.4 3.6
HU22 3.8 3.4 3.2 4.2
HU23 3.8 3.8 2.8 4.2
HU24 3.8 3.4 3.2 3.8
HU25 3.6 3.4 2.8 3.8
HU26 4.2 3.8 2.8 3.8
HU27 4.2 3.6 2.6 4.4
HU28 3.8 3.6 3.2 4.2
HU29 3.8 3.6 2.6 4.2
HU30 3.8 3.6 2.6 4.2
HU31 3.8 3.8 3.2 4.4
HU32 3.8 3.4 3.2 4.2
HU33 3.8 3.6 3.2 4.2
HU34 4.2 3.8 3.2 4.2
HU35 3.8 3.2 2.8 4.2
Avg. 3.81 3.45 2.98 4.07
To identify the importance of all aspects presented in Figure 8, the obtained results were analyzed
statistically by using the T (statistical) value, the p (importance) and the correlation (size effect). Figure 9
depicts the results obtained from this analysis. Furthermore, Pearson correlation was performed
to determine the relatedness between the perceived recommendation quality, the perceived system
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 18 of 24 
HU18 3.8 3.2 3.2 4.2 
HU19 4.2 4.2 3.2 3.8 
HU20 3.8 3.6 2.8 4.2 
HU21 3.8 3.6 3.4 3.6 
HU22 3.8 3.4 3.2 4.2 
HU23 3.8 3.8 2.8 4.2 
HU24 3.8 3.4 3.2 3.8 
HU25 3.6 3.4 2.8 3.8 
HU26 4.2 3.8 2.8 3.8 
HU27 4.2 3.6 2.6 4.4 
HU28 3.8 3.6 3.2 4.2 
HU29 3.8 3.6 2.6 4.2 
HU30 3.8 3.6 2.6 4.2 
HU31 3.8 3.8 3.2 4.4 
HU32 3.8 3.4 3.2 4.2 
HU33 3.8 3.6 3.2 4.2 
HU34 4.2 3.8 3.2 4.2 
HU35 3.8 3.2 2.8 4.2 
Avg. 3.81 3.45 2.98 4.07 
To identify the importance of all aspects presented in Figure 8, the obtained results were 
analyzed statistically by using the T (statistical) value, the p (importance) and the correlation (size 
Eenffeergcite)s.2 F02ig0,u1r3e,  190 9d7epicts the results obtained from this analysis. Furthermore, Pearson correlatio1n9 wofa24s 
performed to determine the relatedness between the perceived recommendation quality, the 
epeerccetiivveende sssy, satnedmp eerfcfeecivtievdensaetsiss,f aacntidon p. eArsceciavnebde soabtsisefravcetdiofnro. mAsF igcaunre b9e,  poebrcseeirvveeddr efcroommm Feingduareti o9n, ff
qpueraclietiyvepdo srietcivoemlymiennflduaetniocnes qtuhaeliptye rpcoeisviteidveslyys itnefmlueenceecsti tvheen pesesrc(erive0d.6 s7y5s,tepm e0f.f5e)catinvdenthesesp (re r=c 0.6ff = < eiv7e5d, 
spa t<i s0f.a5c)t iaonnd( rthe0 p.8e9r1c,epived0 .s0a1t)i.sAfalcstoio, pn e(rrc e=i v0e.8d91sy, spt e<m 0.e01e)c. tAivlesnoe, spse(rrceiv0e.6d6 9s,ypstem0. 0e5f)feacntidvpenerecsesi v(re d= = < ff = <
s0a.6ti6s9f,a pct <io 0n.0(5r) an0d.9 4p3e,rpceiv0e.d0 1s)ahtiasvfaectainonim (rp =o 0rt.9a4n3t,i pn fl<u 0e.0n1c)e hoanvteh aenu ismerp’osritnatnetn itnioflnuetoncues oe.n the user's = <
intention to use. 
 
Figure 9. Experiment results.
Figure 9. Experiment results. 
Finally, it should be noted that perceived satisfaction obtained higher correlation values than those
Finally, it should be noted that perceived satisfaction obtained higher correlation values than 
obtained by the perceived system effectiveness; hence, we can conclude that perceived satisfaction has
those obtained by the perceived system effectiveness; hence, we can conclude that perceived 
a stronger effect on user’s intention to use HEMS-IoT.
satisfaction has a stronger effect on user's intention to use HEMS-IoT. 
5. Conclusions
5. Conclusions 
Energy efficiency has become a key research area, because energy consumption exponentially
increEasneesrgays yefefaicrisegnocyb hy,aps abretcicoumlaer lay kienyt hreesreeasricdhe narteiaal, sbeecctaour.seI fecnoemrgbyi nceodnswuimthpttihoenI eoxTppoanreandtiiaglmly, 
hinocmreeasaeust oams ayteiaorns sgyos tbemy, spaarretipcurolamrliysi ning tehnee rrgeysisdaevnitniagl asletecrtonra.t iIvf ecso.mTbhienIeodT wcaitnhs tuhcec eIsosTfu pllayracdoilglemct,, 
dhoismtreib auutteo,manadtioann asylyszteemdsa taaret oprcoomnviseirntgi tentoerkgnyo swavleidngge alatnerdniantifvoersm. aTthioe nIo; Th ocwane vsuerc,cIeosTsfudlelyv iccoelslefcotr, 
sdmisatrritbhuotme, easnhda vaenalilmyzitee ddarteas otuo rccoesn.vTeorto ivt etroc okmnoewthliesdlgime iatnatdio inn,fiotrims iamtiponor; thanowt teovceorn, sIiodTe rdoetvhiecresd afotar 
hsmanadrtli nhgomaletesr hnaavtiev elism—isteudc hreassomuraccehsi.n Teol eoavrnerincogmane dthbiisg ldimatiata—titoonc, oitl leisc ti,mmpaonratagnet, aton dcoannsaildyezre olathrgeer 
v olumes of data. The big data analytics technologies are used to obtain and analyze large amounts of
data, whereas machine learning algorithms and statistical models based on patterns and inferences
are needed by the system to meet its goals. Additionally, machine learning provides alternatives to
learning-based problems and identifies the background and characteristics of such problems in order
to learn from them and increase system functioning.
Current challenges in the residential sector related to energy consumption are areas of opportunity
for the IoT paradigm, machine learning, and big data technologies. In this work, we proposed
HEMS-IoT, a big data and machine learning-based smart home energy management system for
home comfort, safety, and energy saving. Machine learning techniques and big data technologies are
important in our work, because they are used by the system to analyze and classify energy consumption
efficiency, identify user behavior patterns, and ensure home comfort. We used the machine learning
algorithm J48 and Weka API to learn energy consumption patterns and user behavioral patterns. Also,
RuleML and Apache Mahout were used to create energy-saving recommendations based on user
preferences to preserve smart home comfort and safety. We presented a case study to validate HEMS-IoT,
where we monitored a smart home to ensure home comfort and safety and reduce energy consumption.
In conclusion, three factors were fundamental in achieving energy consumption reduction in this case
study: (1) the commitment of smart home inhabitants to change their energy consumption habits,
(2) follow-ups on the system’s energy-saving recommendations, and (3) the fact that the system allows
users to modify the operating parameters of domotic devices. From this perspective, we trust that the
results obtained in this work will be a motivation for more users to rely on HEMS-IoT when seeking a
smart home management alternative that makes it possible to optimize energy consumption and thus
make savings.
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 20 of 24
Our proposal has five main constraints. First, the HEMS-IoT mobile application only works on the
Android operating system, even though we know that the tablet market is dominated by iOs. Second,
our system is only compatible with some types of home automation sensor. Third, we only use big data
technologies and the J48 machine learning algorithm. Fourth, the system does not generate customized
energy-saving recommendations due to some limitations having arisen during the research process.
Five, we did not collect data on energy consumption from domotic devices before the implementation
of HEMS-IoT.
As future work, we will seek to implement HEMS-IoT on a larger scale and among smart homes
using a greater number of domotic devices. Additionally, we will intend to incorporate location-based
functionalities in HEMS-IoT by relying on the GPS from mobile devices. In this sense, we expect that
HEMS-IoT will be able to estimate residents’ arrival time at home to increase comfort by performing
actions such as playing music or turning the air conditioner in advance based on the mood of the user.
Finally, we will seek to include solar panels—in order to minimize electrical energy consumption—and
implement more advanced security strategies, such as blockchain and cyber security.
Author Contributions: Conceptualization, I.M.-C., G.A.-H. and M.A.P.-V.; Data curation, M.A.P.-V.; Formal
analysis, L.R.-M. and J.O.O.-A.; Funding acquisition, G.A.-H., M.A.P.-V. and J.L.S.-C.; Investigation, J.L.S.-C.;
Methodology, I.M.-C. and M.A.P.-V.; Project administration, G.A.-H.; Resources, G.A.-H.; Software, I.M.-C.,
M.A.P.-V. and L.R.-M.; Supervision, L.R.-M. and J.O.O.-A.; Validation, I.M.-C., G.A.-H. and L.R.-M.; Visualization,
J.L.S.-C. and J.O.-O.A.; Writing—original draft, I.M.-C.; Writing—review & editing, G.A.-H. and M.A.P.-V. All
authors have read and agreed to the published version of the manuscript.
Funding: This research was funded by Mexico’s National Council of Science and Technology (CONACYT)
through project 52–2016: "Application of Big Data and Semantic Web techniques to Develop Intelligent Systems,"
a postdoctoral grant, and a doctoral grant.
Acknowledgments: This work was supported by Mexico’s National Technological Institute (TecNM) and
sponsored by both Mexico’s National Council of Science and Technology (CONACYT) and the Secretariat of
Public Education (SEP) through the PRODEP project (Programa para el Desarrollo Profesional Docente).
Conflicts of Interest: The authors declare that there are no potential conflicts of interest with respect to the
publication of this article.
References
1. Thema, J.; Suerkemper, F.; Couder, J.; Mzavanadze, N.; Chatterjee, S.; Teubler, J.; Thomas, S.; Ürge-Vorsatz, D.;
Hansen, M.B.; Bouzarovski, S.; et al. The multiple benefits of the 2030 EU energy efficiency potential. Energies
2019, 12, 2798. [CrossRef]
2. Filho, G.P.R.; Villas, L.A.; Gonçalves, V.P.; Pessin, G.; Loureiro, A.A.F.; Ueyama, J. Internet of Things
Energy-efficient smart home systems: Infrastructure and decision-making process. Internet Things 2019, 5,
153–167. [CrossRef]
3. Li, W.; Logenthiran, T.; Phan, V.; Woo, W.L. Implemented IoT based Self-learning Home Management System
(SHMS) for Singapore. IEEE Internet Things J. 2018, 5, 2212–2219. [CrossRef]
4. Matsui, K.; Yamagata, Y.; Kawakubo, S. Real-time sensing in residential area using IoT technology for finding
usage patterns to suggest action plan to conserve energy. Energy Procedia 2019, 158, 6438–6445. [CrossRef]
5. Bonomi, F.; Milito, R.; Zhu, J.; Addepalli, S. Fog Computing and Its Role in the Internet of Things. In
Proceedings of the First Edition of the MCC Workshop on Mobile Cloud Computing, Helsinki, Finland,
13–17 August 2012; pp. 13–15.
6. Li, S.; Xu, L.D.; Zhao, S. The internet of things: A survey. Inf. Syst. Front. 2015, 17, 243–259. [CrossRef]
7. Bandyopadhyay, D.; Sen, J. Internet of things: Applications and challenges in technology and standardization.
Wirel. Pers. Commun. 2011, 58, 49–69. [CrossRef]
8. Gawali, S.K.; Deshmukh, M.K. Energy autonomy in IoT technologies. Energy Procedia 2019, 156, 222–226.
[CrossRef]
9. Al-Ali, A.R.; Zualkernan, I.A.; Rashid, M.; Gupta, R.; Alikarar, M.A. Smart Home Energy Management
System Using IoT and Big Data Analytics Approach. IEEE Trans. Consum. Electron. 2017, 63, 426–434.
[CrossRef]
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 21 of 24
10. Schuelke-Leech, B.A.; Barry, B.; Muratori, M.; Yurkovich, B.J. Big Data issues and opportunities for electric
utilities. Renew. Sustain. Energy Rev. 2015, 52, 937–947. [CrossRef]
11. Huang, H.; Yu, H. Compact and Fast Machine Learning Accelerator for IoT Devices; Springer: Singapore, 2019;
pp. 13–23.
12. Alarifi, A.; Tolba, A. Optimizing the network energy of cloud assisted internet of things by using the adaptive
neural learning approach in wireless sensor networks. Comput. Ind. J. 2019, 106, 133–141. [CrossRef]
13. Machorro-cano, I.; Paredes-Valverde, M.A.; Alor-Hernandez, G.; del Pilar Salas-Zárate, M.;
Segura-Ozuna, M.G.; Sánchez-Cervantes, J.L. PESSHIoT: Smart Platform for Monitoring and Controlling
Smart Home Devices and Sensors. Technol. Innov. CITI 2019. Commun. Comput. Inf. Sci. 2019, 1124, 137–150.
14. Paredes-Valverde, M.A.; Alor-Hernández, G.; García-Alcaráz, J.L.; del Pilar Salas-Zárate, M.;
Colombo-Mendoza, L.O.; Sánchez-Cervantes, J.L. IntelliHome: An internet of things-based system for
electrical energy saving in smart home environment. Comput. Intell. 2020, 36, 203–224. [CrossRef]
15. Samuel, S.S.I. A review of connectivity challenges in IoT-smart home. In Proceedings of the 2016 3rd MEC
International Conference Big Data Smart City, ICBDSC, Muscat, Oman, 15–16 March 2016; pp. 364–367.
16. Kang, B.; Park, S.; Lee, T.; Park, S. IoT-based Monitoring System using Tri-level Context Making Model for
Smart Home Services. In Proceedings of the 2015 IEEE International Conference on Consumer Electronics
(ICCE), Berlin, Germany, 6–9 September 2015; pp. 1–2.
17. Adiono, T.; Vidya, R.; Putra, W.; Fathany, M.Y.; Wibisono, M.A.; Adijarto, W. Smart Home Platform Based
on Optimized Wireless Sensor Network Protocol and Scalable Architecture. In Proceedings of the 2015
9th International Conference on Telecommunication Systems Services and Applications (TSSA), Bandung,
Indonesia, 25–26 November 2015; pp. 1–5.
18. Lee, N.K.; Lee, H.K.; Lee, H.W.; Ryu, W. Implementation of Smart home Service over Web of Object
Architecture. In Proceedings of the 2015 International Conference on Information and Communication
Technology Convergence (ICTC), Jeju Island, Korea, 28–30 October 2015; pp. 1215–1219.
19. Montesdeoca-Contreras, J.C.; Avila-Campoverde, R.S.; Cabrera-Hidalgo, J.C.; Vintimilla-Tapia, P.E. Mobile
Applications Using TCP/IP-GSM Protocols Applied to Domotic. In Proceedings of the 2015 XVI Workshop
on Information Processing and Control (RPIC), Cordoba, Argentina, 6–9 October 2015; pp. 1–4.
20. Chilipirea, C.; Ursache, A.; Popa, D.O.; Pop, F. Energy efficiency and robustness for IoT: Building a smart
home security system. In Proceedings of the 2016 IEEE 12th International Conference on Intelligent Computer
Communication and Processing (ICCP), Cluj-Napoca, Romania, 8–10 September 2016; pp. 43–48.
21. Elkhorchani., H.; Grayaa, K. Novel home energy management system using wireless communication
technologies for carbon emission reduction within a smart grid. J. Clean. Prod. 2016, 135, 950–962. [CrossRef]
22. Salman, L.; Salman, S.; Jahangirian, S.; Abraham, M.; German, F.; Blair, C. Energy efficient IoT-based smart
home. In Proceedings of the 2016 IEEE 3rd World Forum on Internet of Things (WF-IoT), Reston, VA, USA,
12–14 December 2017; pp. 526–529.
23. Baker, T.; Asim, M.; Tawfik, H.; Aldawsari, B.; Buyya, R. An Energy-aware Service Composition Algorithm
for Multiple Cloud-based IoT Applications. J. Netw. Comput. Appl. 2017, 89, 96–108. [CrossRef]
24. Matsui, K. An information provision system as a function of HEMS to promote energy conservation and
maintain indoor comfort. Energy Procedia 2017, 105, 3213–3218. [CrossRef]
25. Fensel, A.; Tomic, D.K.; Koller, A. Contributing to appliances’ energy efficiency with Internet of Things,
smart data and user engagement. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2017, 76, 329–338. [CrossRef]
26. Hossain, M.S.; Rahman, M.A.; Muhammad, G. Cyber–physical cloud-oriented multi-sensory smart home
framework for elderly people: An energy efficiency perspective. J. Parallel Distrib. Comput. 2017, 103, 11–21.
[CrossRef]
27. Kibria, M.G.; Jarwar, M.A.; Ali, S.; Kumar, S.; Chong, I. Web Objects Based Energy Efficiency for Smart Home
IoT Service Provisioning. In Proceedings of the 2017 Ninth International Conference on Ubiquitous and
Future Networks (ICUFN), Milan, Italy, 4–7 July 2017; pp. 55–60.
28. Chauhan, M.A.; Babar, M.A. Using Reference Architectures for Design and Evaluation of WoT: A Case of Smart
Homes Domain, 1st ed.; Elsevier Inc.: Amsterdam, The Netherlands, 2017; pp. 205–228.
29. Lanfur, G.O.F.; Pérez, J.F.P. Implementación de un Sistema de Seguridad Independiente y Automatización de
una Residencia por medio del Internet de las Cosas. In Proceedings of the 2017 IEEE Central America and
Panama Student Conference (CONESCAPAN), Panama City, Panama, 20–22 September 2017; pp. 1–5.
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 22 of 24
30. Iqbal, J.; Khan, M.; Talha, M.; Farman, H.; Jan, B.; Muhammad, A.; Khattak, H.A. A Generic Internet of
Things Architecture for Controlling Electrical Energy Consumption in Smart Homes. Sustain. Cities Soc.
2018, 43, 443–450. [CrossRef]
31. Marinakis, V.; Doukas, H.; Tsapelas, J.; Mouzakitis, S.; Sicilia, Á.; Madrazo, L.; Sgouridis, S. From big data to
smart energy services: An application for intelligent energy management. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2018.
[CrossRef]
32. Jo, H.; Yoon, Y.I. Intelligent smart home energy efficiency model using artificial TensorFlow engine. Hum.
Cent. Comput. Inf. Sci. 2018, 8, 1–18. [CrossRef]
33. Filho, G.P.R.; Mano, A.D.B.V.L.Y.; Villas, L.A.; Ueyama, J. A Low-Cost Smart Home Automation to Enhance
Decision-Making based on Fog Computing and Computational Intelligence. IEEE Lat. Am. Trans. 2018, 16,
186–191. [CrossRef]
34. Tao, M.; Zuo, J.; Liu, Z.; Castiglione, A.; Palmieri, F. Multi-layer cloud architectural model and ontology-based
security service framework for IoT-based smart homes. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2018, 78, 1040–1051.
[CrossRef]
35. Iqbal, A.; Ullah, F.; Anwar, H.; Kwak, K.S.; Imran, M.; Jamal, W.; Rahman, A.U. Interoperable
Internet-of-Things platform for smart home system using Web-of-Objects and cloud. Sustain. Cities
Soc. 2018, 38, 636–646. [CrossRef]
36. Yassine, A.; Singh, S.; Hossain, M.S.; Muhammad, G. IoT Big Data Analytics for Smart Homes with Fog and
Cloud Computing. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2018, 91, 563–573. [CrossRef]
37. Matsui, K. An information provision system to promote energy conservation and maintain indoor comfort
in smart homes using sensed data by IoT sensors. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2018, 82, 388–394. [CrossRef]
38. Terroso-Saenz, F.; González-Vidal, A.; Ramallo-González, A.P.; Skarmeta, A.F. An open IoT platform for the
management and analysis of energy data. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2019, 92, 1066–1079. [CrossRef]
39. Park, J.; Kim, T.; Lee, C. Development of Thermal Comfort-Based Controller and Potential Reduction of the
Cooling Energy Consumption of a Residential Building in Kuwait. Energies 2019, 12, 3348. [CrossRef]
40. Bouaziz, M.; Rachedi, A.; Belghith, A.; Berbineau, M.; Alahmadi, S. EMA-RPL: Energy and Mobility Aware
Routing for the Internet of Mobile Things. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2019, 97, 247–258. [CrossRef]
41. Mancini, F.; Lo Basso, G.; De Santoli, L. Energy Use in Residential Buildings: Impact of Building Automation
Control Systems on Energy Performance and Flexibility. Energies 2019, 12, 2896. [CrossRef]
42. Sun, M.; Zhou, Z.; Wang, J.; Du, C.; Gaaloul, W. Energy-Efficient IoT Service Composition for Concurrent
Timed Applications. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2019, 100, 1017–1030. [CrossRef]
43. Meenaa, N.K.; Kumarb, A.; Singh, A.R.; Swarnkar, A.; Gupta, N.; Niazi, K.R.; Kumar, P.; Bansal, R.C. Optimal
Planning of Hybrid Energy Conversion Systems for Annual Energy Cost Minimization in Indian Residential
Buildings. Energy Procedia 2019, 158, 2979–2985. [CrossRef]
44. Le, N.T.; Benjapolakul, W. Evaluation of Contribution of PV Array and Inverter Configurations to Rooftop
PV System Energy Yield Using Machine Learning Techniques. Energies 2019, 12, 3158. [CrossRef]
45. Castro-antonio, M.K.; Carmona-arroyo, G.; Herrera-luna, I.; Marin-hernandez, A.; Rios-figueroa, H.V.;
Rechy-ramirez, E.J. An Approach based on a Robotics Operation System for the Implementation of
Integrated Intelligent House Services System. In Proceedings of the 2019 International Conference on
Electronics, Communications and Computers (CONIELECOMP), Cholula, Mexico, 27 February–1 March
2019; pp. 182–186.
46. Huh, J.H.; Otgonchimeg, S.; Seo, K. Advanced metering infrastructure design and test bed experiment using
intelligent agents: Focusing on the PLC network base technology for Smart Grid system. J. Supercomput.
2016, 72, 1862–1877. [CrossRef]
47. Jung, S.H.; Huh, J.H. A Novel on Transmission Line Tower Big Data Analysis Model Using Altered K-means
and ADQL. Sustainability 2019, 11, 3499. [CrossRef]
48. Yassine, A.; Singh, S.; Alamri, A. Mining Human Activity Patterns from Smart Home Big Data for Healthcare
Applications. IEEE Access 2017, 5, 13131–13141. [CrossRef]
49. Zhao, Y.; Yu, Y.; Li, Y.; Han, G.; Du, X. Machine learning based privacy-preserving fair data trading in big
data market. Inf. Sci. 2019, 478, 449–460. [CrossRef]
50. Risteska Stojkoska, B.L.; Trivodaliev, K.V. A review of Internet of Things for smart home: Challenges and
solutions. J. Clean. Prod. 2017, 140, 1454–1464. [CrossRef]
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 23 of 24
51. Rathore, M.M.; Paul, A.; Ahmad, A.; Rho, S. Urban planning and building smart cities based on the Internet
of Things using Big Data analytics. Comput. Netw. 2016, 101, 63–80. [CrossRef]
52. Machorro-Cano, I.; Alor-Hernández, G.; Cruz-Ramos, N.A.; Sánchez-Ramírez, C.; Segura-Ozuna, M.G. A
Brief Review of IoT Platforms and Applications in Industry. In New Perspectives on Applied Industrial Tools and
Techniques; Springer: Cham, Switzerland, 2018; pp. 293–324.
53. Hui, T.K.L.; Sherratt, R.S.; Díaz Sánchez, D. Major requirements for building Smart Homes in Smart Cities
based on Internet of Things technologies. Future Gener. Comput. Syst. 2016, 76, 358–369. [CrossRef]
54. Sathyadevi, G. Application of Cart Algorithm in Hepatitis Disease Diagnosis. In Proceedings of the 2011
International Conference on Recent Trends in Information Technology (ICRTIT), Chennai, India, 3–5 June
2011; pp. 1283–1287.
55. Pattanapairoj, S.; Silsirivanit, A.; Muisuk, K.; Seubwai, W.; Cha’on, U.; Vaeteewoottacharn, K.;
Sawanyawisuth, K.; Chetchotsak, D.; Wongkham, S. Improve discrimination power of serum markers
for diagnosis of cholangiocarcinoma using data mining-based approach. Clin. Biochem. 2015, 48, 668–673.
[CrossRef]
56. Tartar, A.; Niyazi, K.; Akan, A. A new method for pulmonary nodule detection using decision trees. In
Proceedings of the 2013 35th Annual International Conference of the IEEE Engineering in Medicine and
Biology Society (EMBC), Osaka, Japan, 3–7 July 2013; pp. 7355–7359.
57. Chen, X.; Ching, W.; Aoki-kinoshita, K.F. Support Vector Machine Methods for the Prediction of Cancer
Growth. In Proceedings of the 2010 Third International Joint Conference on Computational Science and
Optimization, Huangshan, China, 28–31 May 2010; pp. 1–4.
58. Yingchi, Y.; Hui, C.; Dong, W.; Wei, L.; Biyun, Z.; Zhongtao, Z. Diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma based on
combined measurement of multiple serum tumor markers using artificial neural network analysis. Chin.
Med. J. 2014, 127, 1891–1896.
59. Subbalakshmi, G.; Ramesh, K.; Rao, M.C. Decision Support in Heart Disease Prediction System using Naive
Bayes. Indian J. Comput. Sci. Eng. 2011, 2, 170–176.
60. Fageeri, S.O.; Ahmed, S.M.M.; Almubarak, S.A.; Mu’azu, A.A. Eye refractive error classification using
machine learning techniques. In Proceedings of the International Conference on Communication, Control,
Computing and Electronics Engineering (ICCCCEE), Khartoum, Sudan, 1–6 February 2019.
61. Abdalla, A.M.M.; Dress, S.; Zaki, N. Detection of Masses in Digital Mammogram Using Second Order
Statistics and Artificial Neural Network. Int. J. Comput. Sci. Inf. Technol. 2011, 3, 176–186. [CrossRef]
62. Kureshi, N.; Abidi, S.S.R.; Blouin, C. A Predictive Model for Personalized Therapeutic Interventions in
Non-small Cell Lung Cancer. IEEE J. Biomed. Health Inform. 2016, 20, 424–431. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
63. Sood, S.K.; Mahajan, I. A Fog Based Healthcare Framework for Chikungunya. IEEE Internet Things J. 2017, 5,
794–801. [CrossRef]
64. Valiente-rocha, P.A.; Lozano-tello, A. Ontology-Based Expert System for Home Automation Controlling
Ontology-Based Expert System for Home Automation Controlling. In Proceedings of the 23rd International
Conference on Industrial Engineering and Other Applications of Applied Intelligent Systems, IEA/AIE 2010,
Cordoba, Spain, 1–4 June 2010; Volume 6096, pp. 661–670.
65. Wongpatikaseree, K.; Ikeda, M.; Buranarach, M.; Supnithi, T.; Lim, A.O.; Tan, Y. Activity Recognition
using Context-Aware Infrastructure Ontology in Smart Home Domain. In Proceedings of the 2012 Seventh
International Conference on Knowledge, Information and Creativity Support Systems, Victoria, Australia,
8–10 November 2012; pp. 50–57.
66. Comptona, M.; Barnaghi, P.; Bermudez, L.; García-Castro, R.; Corcho, O.; Cox, S.; Graybeal, J.; Hauswirth, M.;
Henson, C.; Herzog, A.; et al. The SSN ontology of the W3C semantic sensor network incubator group. J.
Web Semant. 2012, 17, 25–32. [CrossRef]
67. Sezer, O.B.; Can, S.Z.; Dogdu, E. Development of a Smart Home Ontology and The Implementation of
A Semantic Sensor Network Simulator: An Internet of Things Approach. In Proceedings of the 2015
International Conference on Collaboration Technologies and Systems (CTS), Atlanta, GA, USA, 1–5 June
2015; pp. 12–18.
68. Lyazidi, A.; Mouline, S. ONDAR: An Ontology for Home Automation. In Proceedings of the 2015 15th
International Conference on Intelligent Systems Design and Applications (ISDA), Marrakesh, Morocco,
14–16 December 2015; pp. 260–265.
Energies 2020, 13, 1097 24 of 24
69. Alirezaie, M.; Renoux, J.; Köckemann, U.; Kristoffersson, A.; Karlsson, L.; Blomqvist, E.; Tsiftes, N.; Voigt, T.;
Loutfi, A. An Ontology-based Context-aware System for Smart Homes E-care@home. Sensors 2017, 17, 1586.
[CrossRef]
70. Fernández, M.; Gómez-Pérez, A.; Juristo, N. Methontology: From Ontological Art Towards Ontological
Engineering. In Proceedings of the Spring Symposium Series on Ontological Engineering, AAAI97, Stanford,
CA, USA, 24–26 March 1997; pp. 33–40.
71. Han, J.; Kamber, M.; Pei, J. Data Mining: Concepts and Techniques, 3rd ed.; Elsevier: Amsterdam, The
Netherlands, 2012; pp. 327–391.
72. Bourobou, S.T.M.; Yoo, Y. User Activity Recognition in Smart Homes Using Pattern Clustering Applied to
Temporal ANN Algorithm. Sensors 2015, 15, 11953–11971. [CrossRef]
73. Chen, C.; Das, B.; Cook, D.J. A Data Mining Framework for Activity Recognition in Smart Environments.
In Proceedings of the 2010 Sixth International Conference on Intelligent Environments, Kuala Lumpur,
Malaysia, 19–21 July 2010; pp. 80–83.
74. Das, B.; Chen, C.; Dasgupta, N.; Cook, D.J.; Seelye, A.M. Automated Prompting in a Smart Home Environment.
In Proceedings of the 2010 IEEE International Conference on Data Mining Workshops, Sydney, Australia, 13
December 2010; pp. 1–8.
75. Considine, J.; Li, F.; Kollios, G.; Byers, J. Approximate aggregation techniques for sensor databases. In
Proceedings of the 20th International Conference on Data Engineering, Boston, MA, USA, 30 March–2 April
2004; Volume 20, pp. 449–460.
76. Rajagopalan, R.; Varshney, P.K. Data aggregation techniques in sensor networks: A survey. Electr. Eng.
Comput. Sci. 2006, 6, 48–63. [CrossRef]
77. Fasolo, E.; Rossi, M.; Widmer, J.; Zorzi, M. In-network aggregation techniques for wireless sensor networks:
A survey. IEEE Wirel. Commun. 2007, 14, 70–87. [CrossRef]
78. Konstan, J.A.; Riedl, J. Recommender systems: From algorithms to user experience. User Model. User Adapt.
Interact. 2012, 22, 101–123. [CrossRef]
79. McNee, S.M.; Riedl, J.; Konstan, J.A. Being accurate is not enough: How accuracy metrics have hurt
recommender systems. In Proceedings of the CHI’06 Extended Abstracts on Human Factors in Computing
Systems, Montreal, QC, Canada, 22–27 April 2006; pp. 1097–1101.
80. Knijnenburg, B.P.; Willemsen, M.C. Evaluating Recommender Systems with User Experiments. In
Recommender Systems Handbook; Springer: Boston, MA, USA, 2015; pp. 309–352.
81. Knijnenburg, B.P.; Willemsen, M.C.; Gantner, Z.; Soncu, H.; Newell, C. Explaining the user experience of
recommender systems. User Model. User Adapt. Interact. 2012, 441–504. [CrossRef]
82. Lee, S.; Choi, J. Enhancing user experience with conversational agent for movie recommendation: Effects of
self-disclosure and reciprocity. J. Hum. Comput. Stud. 2017, 103, 95–105. [CrossRef]
83. Pu, P.; Chen, L.; Hu, R. A user-centric evaluation framework for recommender systems. In Proceedings of
the RecSys’ 11 Fifth ACM Conference on Recommender Systems, Chicago, IL, USA, 23–27 October 2011;
Volume 157, pp. 157–164.
84. Herbjørn, N.; Breivik, E. The influence of media on advertising effectiveness a comparison of Internet, posters
and radio. Int. J. Mark. Res. 2005, 47, 383–405.
© 2020 by the authors. Licensee MDPI, Basel, Switzerland. This article is an open access
article distributed under the terms and conditions of the Creative Commons Attribution
(CC BY) license (http://creativecommons.org/licenses/by/4.0/).
